Scorpions would be nice. Scorpions with penises for stings would be even nicer (psychoanalysts love genitalia).
My LOVE tag started with Labels Twenty-Five, which was embossed with Spellbinders™ Impressabilities® Butterfly Garden template. I layered patterned papers then cut/embossed to the tag shape. The black border was cut/embossed with Spellbinders Edgeabilities® Petal edge. The center embellishment was made from Moroccan Accents, Wings of Hope wing, Classic Heart, and the word LOVE from Jewel Keys. Glitter glue and
For all its hilarity, The 14th Tale is a meditation on mortality and change, on the transition from childhood into adulthood that happens when suddenly "trouble" means something different from childish mischief-making. It's a beautifully modulated performance, punctuated by a clever but unobtrusive lighting design by Michael Nabarro, and wholly engrossing: 55 minutes vanishes in a flash. An unexpected gem.
The barrister said her client had made progress while in custody, working on his attitude towards women, and now understood the severity of his actions. She said the youngster now felt ashamed.
You might even include little diagrams if your job is particularly tricky or involved.
And in the lighted palace near
This juxtaposition (between immediate disaster and the efforts of the only man who can stop it) keeps The Doll House Mystery entertaining to its last moments. But it is the very last moments that stick with me. For though the situation is diffused, tensions between the ex-con and the police are not. The head cop still eyes his prey with hostility and suspicion, and it is only when the rich man shakes the poor man’s hand that the police disperse. The rich man’s vouch is good enough for them. So good, in fact, that they neglect to arrest ex-con for anything else he’s done over the course of the film, such as fleeing an arrest warrant or assaulting an officer. Can you imagine? Perhaps an audience of 1915 could. And if so, it makes me wonder how civilized their society really was.
Yes blended :p
On the way, I stopped at the excellent Shafer Canyon Overlook to take in the views. From here, an incredible cliffside jeep road leads travelers into the depths of the canyon. This was once a trail used by cattlemen Frank and John Schafer, who built it in the early 1900s to move stock to additional pastures (the “c” in their name was later dropped by mapmakers). Uranium prospectors upgraded the trail to a four-wheel drive road during the 1950′s so they could reach their claims at the base of the cliffs.
A healthy dose of paranoia keeps you on your toes. It keeps you striving to do the next best thing, to reach higher and achieve more. It's what makes the Ivory Tower go round. But when you start discounting your success because you "really don't deserve it" or "it was just luck," then you know you've got Impostor Syndrome.
You're living your dream.
I was having a cafe-meeting my favorite niece yesterday – kind-of-a daughter . We talked about our daughters. I mentioned the guilt I still felt about being a not good-enough -mother to her – and suddenly I saw that I was guiltless, like a veil was drawn away. Chris looked at me smilingly and noticed something evaporating. Me too.
Thanks for all your wonderful comments. They make me smile.
I have been spending a lot of time on the new site CreateMixedMedia this past week, exploring all it has to offer. Much of my time has focused on the video and text tutorials. It is like taking a series of workshops without leaving home. Here are a few of my favorites...
unless you wish to save a man from death.”
Whenever she wanted to meet him, he was always ‘busy’ partying with friends. And if ever he wanted to meet her, no excuses would be accepted. Even her tests and exams were not as important as him. Often it happened that Iqra had to miss her classes, sacrifice her social life and do all sorts of adjustments possible, just to keep him happy. She made every possible effort to make the relationship work. But he never recognized those and ditched her just for someone prettier.
The 240-acre Shadelands has a 20-percent occupancy rate, and Walnut Creek has been looking at ways to revitalize the business park, which has around 2 million square feet of office space. The presence of the Department of Energy's Joint Genome Institute shows that the business park can be a center for innovation and new technology. And, city leaders say, Walnut Creek has other things that would make it attractive to a creative, moviemaking workforce: a thriving downtown, parks, open space, and an arts scene based around the Lesher Center for the Arts.
"You're sixteen!?"
* He may have been bipolar or may have suffered from depression
Staples
A month or so ago, a group of severl brewsters got together and brewed 'Venus-Jade' (4.0% ABV) as part of Project Venus which aims to show off the skills of female brewers. I think this is a fab idea! I did talk to them briefly before they brewed but unfortunately wasn't able to go on the day, I just hope if they do another one I can help.
Do we really want to focus the bright minds and creative spirits of 50% of our population exclusively on issues of breast-feeding, diaper rash and what to have for dinner?
His words, not mine.
Then there are all the unsung heroes - the Chartists, the coal miners, the Ban the Bomb demonstrators, the lost soldiers from anonymous streets, the suffragettes, the helpful neighbours and the animal rescuers. We should also be proud of their stories for they are the true bones of English society, the hidden foundations.
The fourth of the visitors’ goals came courtesy of Aguero. Taking advantage of an obviously disheartened Norwich side he took the ball to the left side of the box, before dropping his shoulder and curling a beautiful shot into the bottom corner; Ruddy had no chance.
Since the Roaring Twenties, products are indeed manufactured to have a limited life span. The obvious purpose is to whip up consuming habits. However, what looks like a matter of logic and survival for capitalism, is an aberration: growth’s goal is exactly to… grow ad infinitum. “An object which doesn’t eventually wear out, is a business tragedy.” This comment could be read in a 1928 magazine. Today, this kind of consideration is a tragedy for humanity.
“Taking your life more seriously and trying to turn your goals into a reality seem to be your priority issues. You are working very hard to make things work out. You are handling life with much more maturity. Your ambition and energy are reflected in what you want to accomplish. Changes are around you, but you are not going in the direction you imagined. You seem tired of letting life run you and are taking the bull by the horns and seem more in control of your own destiny. There is lots of activity, hard work and determination in your career. What a wonderful time to get a promotion or look for a better job.”
http://www.eaec.org/sermons/2011/RLJ-1295.htm The MP3 works well..The video works well if you let it load for 5 min then play LIFE CHANGING WATCH PASTOR TORELL
In consuming, one becomes a commodity.
"The ANC leaders are afraid of the unions - groups like Cosatu and the SACP - they think these groups deliver a huge constituency but they don't."
6. The Departed (Leonardo DiCaprio & Mark Wahlberg) - A masterpiece. I never understood the hype over Leo, then suddenly I did.
“My dad did not have a choice,” Debbie said. “He’s gone. Michael Selsor should pay the same price.”
I'll conclude with an exchange in June 2009 between these two hyper-conscious jews about how jews are innocent and Whites (disingenously euphemized first as "Protestants", then as "Christians", and finally as the "white gentile majority") are to blame, excerpted from Black racial preferences at Annapolis; and a conversation with Paul Gottfried about white guilt,, Jews, and Protestants (Auster's emphasis):LA replies:
Here it is in ’10. Its photograph from last year is a bit boring, lacking a human being. It was just beginning to settle thoroughly down, and had much enjoyed the mild winter we’ve just had. I wish I had photographed it when we were there in February.
.....so lovely and it gives off a vibe that's not stuffy or designer or hard to achieve..just really lovely homely inspiration for the crafty and not so crafty among us... it's had me heading for the paint store with my little swatches of blue (again!) reaching for my yarn bag to start another crochet project and trawling ebay for a little wire cotton reel rack...
I hope to have it done within the week, but I know...you all have heard that before.
If it was, as appeared to be the case, that most of those who taught in schools during the 1980's, felt it their duty to ensure that that their pupils did not become part of Thatcher's constituency, some might ask if it is entirely appropriate for an educator to resort to the sort of political propaganda we saw at that time.
Brawling is bad enough. But if he has abused his position of power and authority with an impressionable schoolgirl that would be something else.
Ali was fighting for a dream.
My answer was true and constant: “Keith is my regular but he’s not my boyfriend.” At times when I don’t like the delivery of the question I would reply: “Bakit, mukha bang kami?” (Does it look like we’re an item?) and leave them hanging. Even Charlie asked me once if Keith and I are a couple. Charlie also asked if Carlo and Ella were an item. I immediately told Ella and she took care of Charlie and his nosy ways.
list of contacts, they offer a link to a video
I like to think I have outgrown some of that. I'm usually open to trying new fruits and vegetables these days since my vegetable preferences are kind of limited and I feel I need to expand. I try to approach every new food with an open mind.
01--(07:58)--- Kow Kow (dedicated to Spiro Agnew)
I have never really bonded with Samuel Beckett’s novella, Mercier and Camier. I can see Vladimir and Estragon evolving (devolving?) into Hamm and Clov, but a younger Didi and Gogo would be like the younger Krapp, more positive as well as more naïve. It would be a lie to say that I’d always wanted to rewrite Mercier and Camier because no such thought had ever crossed my mind, but the idea of a Vladimir and Estragon: The Early Days did, I have to say, appeal. I’d already imagined them dead and in some kind of limbotic state so why not go the other way? And so that’s what I did—sort of.
6: SHIRLEY & LEE - A Little Word
You drag the singing bird
Their directions seemed super simple: make paint mixture from 1 part dish detergent to 2 parts metallic acrylic paint. Paint the shiny side of clear contact paper, allow to dry 1 hour between coats (you may need up to 3 coats of paint). Remove paper backing and adhere over pre-printed text. Here are my tricks for working with this paint:
Nik fell into step behind her and, as they passed through the doorway, he realized that the door hadn’t simply been open, but had been blown completely out of the trackway and laid on the carpeted floor several steps beyond the entrance. The office bulged out away from the doorway and was comprised of several small tiers; at the top of which was a very large desk and a rather small man.
Honesty: isn’t that the one thing you ask of a book? (Well, all right – likeable characters and decent spelling obviously come into it.) Russell Brand’s Booky Wook is just hilariously honest (and I don’t just mean ‘frank enough to make your granny wince’). There was a generational divide over the Andrew Sachs affair and I was on the grumpy-old-woman side of it (on grounds of kindness rather than taste). But really, Brand is so truthful, I defy anyone not to respect his writing (even if liking him is a stretch for you). He tells you stuff about himself whether it paints him in a flattering light or not (and mostly it doesn’t). He’s even honest about his dishonesty.
Black pepper to your taste
This, by the way, applies not only to human beings.
child of God, increasing in the revelation of God’s Word. Today, I make
I've been very impressed with the quality and quantity of entries this year. Making a decision has been difficult and some of you will, I'm afraid, be disappointed.
Since the Mayor could no longer stand gardens
This combination more than swallows my kit for a life on the road. Distributing the weight across the four panniers gives a predictable and sure footed ride when in the saddle. Only the bar bag upsets this weight distribution but the advantages of having valuables and snacks to hand is a major plus, as is the simple removal of the bag when you’re leaving the bike locked.
"Hi Lisa".
Total Snore-fest.
Volatile organic compounds (carbon-based gaseous substances with a variety of detrimental health effects) and other dangerous chemicals are burned off directly into the air during this on-site compression process. Meanwhile, the returned ‘fracking fluid’, now conveniently called wastewater, is either transported off or stored in large – open-air – membrane lined pits – on site, where it is allowed to evaporate. ‘Fracking’ is an energy-and resource-intensive process. Again, if the UK experience will be similar to the US, every individual shale-gas drilling site that is ‘fracked’ requires between three and eight million gallons of water. Huge transport fleets have to make hundreds of trips to carry this ‘fracking fluid’ to and from each drilling site.
Posted by Justin "The Claw" at 11:50 PM 2 comments
Till date, Aishwarya Rai Bachchan reportedly pocketed a whopping 6 crore to star opposite Rajinikanth in Endhiran. While this still is the benchmark for the girls down south to beat, the rest seem to have made little progress in their own way.
W. C. Morrow – The Surgeon’s Experiment
and take a seat, by the far wall if
The basic and democratic demands by Bersih can be met by Najib’s government if he has the political will to do so. More's the pity, he has no tenacity to do so for fear of a backlash from those within UMNO who are waiting to topple him.
My friend Rebecca introduced me to this place & it was love at first sit. It's the perfect place to cozy up and drink your self warm again. Luxurious, a bit swanky, but they'll let you sit and relax for hours with a good book. (Read: I'm cheap 5€ is already a lot, so I'm getting my damn money's worth!)
Brian H. Stuy
What can adults do about cyberbullying?
What great news. Considering most female obstetricians (yes, even those in countries where birth is not midwife but OB GYN led) would prefer to have an elective cesarean I think this move was a long time coming.
May we give thanks in all things, being reminded that we are not entitled to anything on this earth. And in so doing, may we grow in humility. May your act of thanksgiving the next few days be an act of worship. And may it saturate every area and every day of your life.
What’s the one thing nobody knows about you?
PS. Be sure to join the site so you can enter the giveaway!
6 fried green tomato slices
We really have to face facts and accept that he is definitely not guard dog material.
There's a clip of this Doctor at Large episode on YouTube, but the rotter has disabled embedding... but if you're keen to see a non-Cleese Basil Fawlty, click here.
Allow me to summarize… My dad was an abusive alcoholic. My entire life (or the 21 years of it he was alive), I knew of disappointment, hatred, poverty, lonliness and the feeling of constant abandonment. I agree this is no way for a child to grow up. But he was my dad, I loved him and I always gave him another chance to prove the doubters wrong.
Who I am today is so different than who I was a year ago. It seems a year of near isolation in a vastly different cultural environment, can either take it's toll or change one for the better. It's changed me for the better. I think it's done so mostly because I've been forced to see myself. I've had time to think. I've had time to learn gratitude for the things that really matter in life. I've had time to write and to take inventory of myself.
Adorn the trifle with chocolate buttons. To make it a little more fancy you could add Amaretto to the cream too, and grate dark chocolate over the top rather than chocolate buttons.
Ryan Speier - 0.8 WAR = 0 points
Hotho reported on a pilot study in which she examined motivation among ab initio students as a dynamic that can change over time. Participants were undergraduates learning German on an institution-wide-language programme. Results showed that although students were motivated to learn German throughout, their motivation decreased over time as they reported finding it progressively difficult. Although this was a small study, the author raised the question as to whether greater encouragement might help learners.
Zielhuis GA, Hulscher MEJL, Florack EIM. Validity and reliability of a questionnaire on fecundity. Int J Epidemiol 1992; 21: 1151-1156.
The Logo
The weight of my loss came crashing down on me. I cried for all the dreams that may never be. For all the times I fought for love and lost. Lagi na lang bang ganito? (Is it always this way?)
Morning Everyone!
This series has been authored by Miriam Levenson, whom the 1709 Blog gives its grateful thanks.
To illustrate my point I will cite three unsolved murder cases that occurred after South Africa became a democracy. There are plenty more, but for now these three cases will suffice. In the first two cases it does not seem that the ANC government was involved. In the third case (Brett Kebble) the victim had close ties to the ANC.
On the table was one of those foam rubber stress balls with some logo or other on it. It happened to be blue.
Their daughter Lacey, born in 1984, has the mental ability of a four or five–month–old infant. Her mental and physical disabilities weren’t immediately obvious to her doctor or her parents, though by the time her daughter was three months old, Peggy knew something was wrong.
But he let him stray on his tedious way,
We were destined…
878 ***D-V/5/1984. “Law and Order: Hopes and Fears (On Handguns).” Law Week Meeting, Optimist Club Luncheon, Oak Park, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item B-5, above, pp. 367-74 (1992).)
That's all fine and good, right? (Just say yes. This isn't the part I need opinions on. Unless you have a good one. In which case, go to it in the comments.)
HSN customers will have the opportunity to pre-order an exclusive 2-disc bundle ($19.95, free S&H) on HSN.com that includes Josh's new PUNCHING BAG release and the ICON Series: The Best of Josh Turner, which includes 11 of his number one hits, such as "Long Black Train" and "Would you go with me".
- I love Paris
Moreover you shall select from the people able me, such as fear God, men of truth, hating covetousness, and place such over them to be rulers of thousands, rulers of fifties, and rulers of tens.
Report on Credit in China as of October 14, 2011
Worldly Desires, Apichatong Weerasethakul, Thailand. Experimental, 43 min.
The constable took him to hospital but he died on arrival. This culminated in crowds of whites and blacks facing and baiting each one another. Revolver shots rang out. Six Arabs faced charges including firing a revolver. It appears the riot grew out of white mens’objections to coloured men consorting with white women.
Ah Jordan! Bustling Amman, where every shop or establishment shows how much loved the Monarchy there is, highways through the desert where something constantly reminds you – this is what the Bible talks about!
As we finally rolled into our first destination -- the beautiful Czech town, and UNESCO world heritage site, of Český Krumlov -- I had one Air France barf bag held under one child's mouth and another Air France barf bag under the other, all while giving Alex directions because the GPS (whom we'd nicknamed "girlfriend") couldn't find our pension's address. But we got it done, as we always do, and gave each other unnatural shell-shocked smiles as we climbed out of the car.
Holding the pen, I swipe and I sweep it upon the pages, letting the ink form into the various curves and shapes that dictate what today’s language is.
2. Still miss the angry Elvis Costello
Edit 8: Over $9,000 and I'm in a state of shock. I...... Just.....................Thank you.
I had suggested to them that the center focus operated more like darken/lighten center from color efex pro and it looks like thats what we’re seeing in the new update. I’m so pleased with the way this tool works now. I rarely used center focus before, but now I think I’ll be using it a lot more often now that there are a number of great presets and you have the ability to set the point of center focus. I think its got to be the best vignette tool on the iphone now because of how natural it looks.
*He loves to hang out on his back on the couch and look at the black and white pictures above him, he will smile at them all day.
Anyway, next on the docket was a Donnie Yen wiu xia called 14 Blades. I posted this on Twitter earlier, but it bears repeating. This genre is one that I am confused the most by yet admire the most. I'm not saying that wiu xia is my favorite genre, but that of all the genres that typically go over my head, this one I still manage to enjoy more often than not.
Anyways, these groups have taken McDonalds to court and also won. They are not demanding money, all they are demanding is an exact listing of all contents: edible and chemical, that go into each and every one of McDonalds (and all other such places) "food". This of course, is a disaster for the industry.
W1: To tell you the truth, I never had time to think about it. Before I even saw him, my six-year-old had asked him what he was going to do with all the oranges he was buying.
Ummmm what else?
In a sane society, the truth about a dangerous, indolent, low-IQ, criminal welfare parasite like the one featured in this article would be described by a nation's newspaper of record with a degree of honesty that would have redeeming value for society at large : namely as a net drain on the community, the type of individual whose very existence should be discouraged for the greater common good.
If I professed my bafflement,
Putting aside the 1937 JUNGLE JIM serial, Sam Katzman's low-budget series of potboilers were the first feature-film adaptations of the character. JUNGLE MANHUNT, the seventh in the series, starts out with the suggestion that it may possess the uncanny phenomenality, as it begins with a peaceful village being raided for slaves by warriors led by "skeleton-men" (men in obvious costumes). Jungle Jim, a hunter who apparently protects the jungle from evil in his spare time, investigates the raiders while simultaneously guiding a snippy girl photographer in search of a white man who became lost in the jungle. At one point Jim and reporter Ann encounter a pair of "dinosaurs" (the usual lizards filmed to look big), but though they have nothing to do with the story, their presence alone would push the flick into "marvelous" territory. However, as Jim and Ann find their way to the raiders' camp, they encounter another science-fictional element, in an evil doctor who's using native slaves to mine radioactive materials. It turns out that the evil doctor is making synthetic diamonds, and his explanation of the process certainly should have won any 1951 award for Best Scientific Goobledygook.
Cut the potatoes and onion on the cutting board with the kitchen knife into pieces that are able to fit into the tube of the food processor.
In general, you shouldn’t impulse buy at all. The most tempting, and often easiest, impulse buy to give into is food, because after all, you definitely need to have that brand new sandwich. But, if you see any of the following examples, or anything like them being advertised on the side of the road, or being dangled at you so seamlessly in front of the checkout, you really need to just move on.
So. I had LOTS of gifts on Christmas morning. Open, open, open. Paper & ribbon everywhere. Gifts strewn here & there. A mess. My mom would clean up the wrapping & boxes. She would pile up all the gifts (now opened) back under the tree. I would pick a couple throughout the day & play with those. The rest, stayed under the tree for a couple days until my mom took them to my room. Ah Christmas. Here & gone.
You are weak. Far more powerful sources have tried to terminate me and have failed. And yet you little ants think you are mightier than the aardvark.
230 - Britt Burns
Perhaps inspired by the success of Panem October’s way of releasing the Panem ID cards for different characters through the medium of various websites, each character poster was officially unveiled at a different entertainment site. But I won’t make you hunt down all those sites. No, I’ll take care of that part and link you to all of the sources through this post. Okay? Good.
While I originally diagnosed this as a lack of discipline, I’ve since changed my stance: I think the Pens were simply outclassed in speed and systems play (particularly Special Teams), which led to a negative feedback loop in which they took an inordinate amount of penalties in trying to compensate.
Proverbs 14:27 The fear of the LORD is a fountain of life, That one may avoid the snares of death.
2. No religion should demand that those who leave it be killed;
We need less miracles (???), more belief. We need less of less and more of more.
Ghastly old school dm with bits of doom thrown in. All the new dm albums seem to be going in this direction but I'm not complaining as long as they're quality. This stuff can be fast paced but then it can also drop down to doom speed and it has loads of groovy melodies. Quality 2011 album.
But occasionally, especially when I'm on the go, book in one hand, mp3 player in my pocket, I don't mind tunes with words in them. In fact, sometimes the phrases on the page complement the lyrics in my ears. That's what happened with that Gil Scott-Heron song. I've listened to it many times; it's one of my favourite tracks by the so-called grandfather of rap. And yet, on that train journey from Gatwick to London, I was moved by it more than at any other time. Mathematically speaking, it was the combination of both 'neutral' and real elements that did it for me: non-fiction book about religion+electronic gadget churning out high-quality pop+my mother's return to Cuba=reflection about the end of polytheism and the start of monotheism in the world and the consequences of this transition.
My first pet peeve is two tied into one..
The home is so appealing and cutting edge, offering you, the astute buyer, inspired living in an unparalleled lifestyle. More information
I see in part, He sees it all.
placed fourth largest contributor to
The winner receives one of the latest stamps of the outcoming collection of Magnolia - Summer Memories! I hope that they arrive at the beginning of May, but otherwise the winner receives her stamp when I can buy this of course! I hope you like this prize!
A second argument: When you look from the perspective of a scientist at the universe, it looks as if it knew we were coming. There are 15 constants — the gravitational constant, various constants about the strong and weak nuclear force, etc. — that have precise values. If any one of those constants was off by even one part in a million, or in some cases, by one part in a million million, the universe could not have actually come to the point where we see it. Matter would not have been able to coalesce, there would have been no galaxy, stars, planets or people. That’s a phenomenally surprising observation. It seems almost impossible that we’re here. And that does make you wonder — gosh, who was setting those constants anyway? Scientists have not been able to figure that out.” He gets asked two other questions that I feel are worthy of being read, so I will provide them.
I know how this all seems
The first time I ever dressed him in his snuggly winter bear suit for the trip to the sitter’s… later that morning she calls and tells me he’s running a fever - a little side effect from the 4 month immunizations the day before. Of course I would decide to bundle him up extra on the day he has a fever :/
I can't even tell you where I got the Physcian's Formula Eye Booster 2-in-1 Lash Boosting Eyeliner and Serum Liquid Liner. (Ok, that's a mouthful) It might have been sent to me by a PR rep or perhaps it was in a goody bag from an event, but either way it sat in amongst my 'items I'll use eventually pile' for a long time. I already had a liquid liner that I loved and didn't believe the claim on the packaging that it would help my lashes grow. About 5 months ago my other liner ran out and I've been consciously trying to use what I already own instead of buying the newest product. Out came this baby, and thanks to my new love of the winged eyeliner I've been using it pretty much every day since. Recently I've been noticing that my lashes were super long, I thought at first it was the new mascara I was using, but then I noticed that it didn't matter which mascara I used, my lashes were definitely longer! Not going to lie, it took me a bit to remember that the liner I was using claimed to do just that.
“Dominique – I didn’t know Elijah was your man, okay?” I whispered softly, putting my hand on her shoulder. She whacked it off like it was some sort of bug.
When you enter a bookstore next year and see your book on the shelf, what do you think your reaction would be?
Two deaths by vigilantism made up a portion of the 46 daily murders in South Africa that occurred over the period. – Nombulelo Damba
Mr 12:30 And thou shalt love the Lord thy God with all thy heart, and with all thy soul, and with all thy mind, and with all thy strength: this is the first commandment. Mr 12:31 And the second is like, namely this, Thou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself. There is none other commandment greater than these.;
So darlings, I will keep on update on my mommy-to-be journey.
"Firstly, the only three surgeons qualified to do the operation have just emigrated to Australia.
Youtube
Or take that the current political controversy in Germany now is how to revamp Hartz IV, welfare, because the Constitutional Court here ruled that the amount of money welfare recipients receive every month is neither dignified nor constitutional. Meanwhile, we've got a political party in the USA that doesn't think the government should require health care for all of its citizens, and goes so far as to deem universal healthcare unconstitutional. "We Germans just don't get that," a German political science professor told me. Of course he doesn't get it, it is a major difference in mentality.
No matter what, I will always be a Donna and be a part of the Donnas' family. I know you guys will continue to support the band and I'll be there too, as the #1 Donnaholic.
At first it will take a while but as you practice I hope you too see the benefits of making a little extra effort. It takes a little longer to make but it only takes a couple of minutes to cook! And this is a FAB ting to do with you kids. I promise you will make just as much mess as them anyway so let them have a go!
The breakfast that Sunday morning (note how nonchalant the Innkeeper is):
Renovating your home can be an exciting endeavor because you get to add a newly designed space to your home that is exactly the way you want it. However, ongoing renovations can also become stressful because they disrupt your normal living patterns and add clutter and dirt to your home. Dust accumulates more quickly, the equipment can be noisy, and the debris from the construction can pose a danger to your kids.
I became a convert to the second approach. I came away with a much clearer understanding of why she makes easy errors on tests that had left me scratching my head. By explaining herself in her own words, this (I hope) thus lessened the chances of a repeat performance. I don’t have to worry about the punishment fitting the crime because my child had confessed to the crime, described in detail how the crime was committed and then levied the punishment. Lastly, if this problem resurfaces, I can say, “Remember when you told me ….” and be confident that indeed she will remember her own words. And if I have to take even stronger measures, I can simply say, “We did it your way last time and now we are going to do it my way.”
How did you celebrate the sale of your first book?
We went to McGillacuddy's after the game, and the coach of the team and a few other of the regular players said they'd like to have me on the team full-time next season. That was nice to hear, and I'm looking forward to it.
The dish was named Oysters Rockefeller after John D. Rockefeller, the richest American at the time, for the richness of the sauce. Though the original recipe is a secret, the sauce is known to be a puree of a number of green vegetables other than spinach. It consists of oysters on the half-shell topped with the sauce and bread crumbs and then baked. Jules Alciatore developed Oysters Rockefeller in the face of a shortage of French snails, substituting the locally available oysters for snails. Antoine’s has been serving the original recipe dish since 1899. It is estimated that Antoine’s has served over three million, five hundred thousand orders.
You frighten me
You know what happens when you do it just because you want to look better in your jeans or just so you can be thinner than the woman standing next to you in line? It doesn't work! It isn't enough (at least for me) to work out so that I can be thin. It has to be about my health... my physical health and my mental health. It's about not getting sick, keeping my cholesterol in check, having strong bones and muscles. It's about being able to relieve stress and push myself to do more which makes me feel better about myself and my future.
I would follow Tom Waits to the end of the earth. Then, when he says “Jump”, I’d probably do it.
The young american Laurette Stivers landed in the multicoloured late 60s London and, through an advert in the press, joined Keith Trowsdale y John McBurnie, two musicians who were looking for a feminine voice for their project. The trio made a demo which soon had them a recording contract and in 1969 they released their first single with the name of Justine. This record was the first issue of the english branch of the american label Dot and was already produced by a man who would be very important for Laurie in the coming years: Hugh Murphy.
Escape Plan Logo Avatar – 4/3
More than this though, looking at a society through its farmers gives, I think, a new and interesting perspective on a universe. It is all very well to write tales of the heroes and kings, but these egotistical posers need to eat something, so somewhere there will be a downtrodden peasant, with a team of oxen, and New Holland 6070 or what ever the 28th century equivalent is. Let’s hear his (or indeed her) story, itsn’t it time they had an adventure?
Lady Mantle: A lush green herb with petals.. Properties: Mineral salts and Hormones. Treatments:..this one is for the ladies..it helps adjust hormonal irregularities..and helps in the healing of wounds.
I’m sitting at the airport (so early!) so I thought I’d show you that I really do own those outfits I suggested the other day!
God’s lioness,
the tugging of the kite, the going slack,
Working with an architect and contractor, we came up with the interior closet plan posted above, that will provide plenty of hanging space and lots of open shelving/cubbies to hold my shoes, sweaters and folded items. I am not a DIYer which is why I needed help with the design and construction, although I am spending the weekend painting every single one of those shelves before they're installed next week.
Rolling snow,
Over the years of litigation, documents have emerged suggesting that the main eyewitness was bribed by prison officials into giving statements against the men and that the state withheld evidence about the perjured testimony of another inmate witness. A further witness later retracted his testimony.
Even at a festival where imperial stouts, barrel-aged rarities, sour one-offs and weird fruit beers abounded this one from De Molen had enough character to stop me and make me pay attention. It's the whole picture. The world of beer geekery in a single glass.
Last week when a major DIY discovery fell into my lap (summary: a life changing moment when I found out that oven cleaner can turn brass to chrome by removing the brass finish to reveal the metal underneath…click here for full post) I thought of a million projects to tackle…the first being my older than dirt doorknobs.
God promised – “This isn’t the end. Give Me the ashes; I’ll do something with them. Something beautiful.”
Forty-plus years ago, when I was a very little boy, my favorite possession was a Snoopy soap dish released by AVON cosmetics, circa 1966. I adored that back-floating beagle. It wasn’t just a bath toy to me; that soap dish got to see a lot more of the world than just a muggy bathroom.
Our family was fortunate enough to have a year to travel around South Africa. As we travelled and learnt and we discovered our own Footprints in South Africa.
NPS is getting away with murder here! They are setting the stage for further industrial expansion into the Bay by permitting the construction of the gas pipeline metering station in the hanger at Floyd Bennet. There hasn't been a peep out of them about the calls for killing the geese. They are DOING NOTHING TO PROTECT GATEWAY AND THE BAY. Plus, there hasn't been a peep out of Congressman Turner, who by the way, supports hydrofracking.
Ever since childhood everything handmade fascinated me. My grandmother who still lives in the Carpathian mountains of Ukraine taught me how to use the sewing machine, paint Easter eggs, collect uuseful herbs and mushrooms in the forest and much more.
I say "lusted after," because $45 is a little steep for a used book I've never looked at. While it might have been fabulous, it also might have been not-so-fabulous, and if I'm going to spend that much money for a book (I never have, not yet), it had better be beyond fabulous.
Shingles. A burglary. Yesterday I had mad nasty food poisoning. I spare you the details on that one, ok? But that's why I didn't post yesterday. I still have not had solid foods.
What I have found out is that I actually really enjoy knitting, it’s such a relaxing and almost therapeutic hobby. You can lose your mind in your own thoughts or even attempt to watch TV at the same time. I think it’s the repetitive action, it’s ever so calming. Or maybe that’s why I keep missing my stitches – I need to concentrate more!
Richard Middleton – On the Brighton Road
22 Saved by Zero
We are, however, perfectly allowed and even encouraged to question what is not clear to us in order to understand it better.
that i'm some giant weirdo
The finished size for this box is 2 1/2" depth x 4 3/4" tall x 6" long.
KaiserCraft black rhinestones
Hercules Morse
The fabric is a gorgeous patterned velvet gleaned from a vintage maxi skirt and the pin whale cord from my stash. The lining is from the classic and versatile Ginger Blossom range. One of my favorite co-ordinates.
What I'd give for my mother, or my grandmother even, to come with groceries and a smile.
(973) 335-9876
You are so creative in your play . . . your favorite things to play with are often not toys at all: a stack of boxes, a handful of kitchen utensils, a dish towel, my keys. One of your favorite things to do is to make forts out of blankets or pillows. Sometimes mommy is allowed in the fort . . . sometimes not. You're an independent little guy, but there are often times you want me with you and my heart just sings when you hold your still-chubby hand out to me and say "Mommy, num!!!".
And still people say that I am so strong.
The award is presented each year to recognize outstanding achievements in conserving Colorado rivers and trout habitat.
I have heard that who ever the writer is, that he is a past priest or was familiar with the priest hood and the priestly system because of the priestly language, which we will stumble on many times through out this letter.
After bin Laden moved from the Tora Bora region of Afghanistan to South Waziristan in northwest Pakistan, his health continued to decline, according to the three former Mehsud couriers. Just what ailments were causing the deterioration was not clear, but he was no longer able to walk, and had to be moved by horseback from one house in South Waziristan to another for security reasons.
It happens every year; your garlic sprouts and you face somewhere between 1 and 6 months without fresh garlic (unless you buy chemically treated stuff from another country...and I don't) or you can do it like my friend Deb.
Claim 1 requires separate center and end sections that are made of different
Back in 2007, The Hindu Forum Of Britain claimed that hundreds of Hindu and Sikh girls had been intimidated by Muslim men who took them on dates before terrorising them until they converted.
with apple pink
Peace is within you right now
The text recalls that in other parts of the world that date is cause for celebration protests and claims for labor and social rights of the vast majority, usurped by the capitalist oligarchy, against today’s rising voices of the excluded.
So now we’re off to Gate D34 and guess what, it’s a coaching gate and it’s a shared area with about 1000 other happy souls, mostly standing at the wrong gate because they read the info screens before they changed as well. The only worry was that when they wanted to leave this gate to go to the right one, they physically couldn’t make it through the crush.
Spread coconut on baking pan and place in an oven set to 350 degrees F for 5-7 minutes or until shreds start to turn light brown. Stir coconut around once to ensure even toasting.
These fallacies are important to know and understand when talking about economic and public policy and their analysis. As observers and students, it is essential we understand why certain events occur and whether there is truly a causal link.
Mayall: That’s the best part.
Edit: I also want to say that although my body is sore I do feel pretty good about myself. I'm also excited to after this 5K to begin training for a 60K on my bike.
A:�Tell him you're pregnant..
Add dimension to your paper piecing by tracing around the edges with a marker in a similar color to create shadows.
The boys brought home a kitten. We have named her pork chop.
Miller Brewing Co. Red Dog
There you have it. One man, and his ability to see...things. Normally I reserve my comment for scoring, and if by now I haven't established myself as a principled man who strives to achieve an unfettered result in my serious studies, then let me reinforce it: Don't let my opinions of this obviously disturbed freak get in the way with your impartial rating. You have nothing to fear from him unless one of your fears are being surprised and assaulted with plastic massage sticks after being sprayed with flammable Jello from a man wearing a Yogi Bear mask.
“Right… I think I need a minute.”
My only criticism is that Prue Leith spent too much time discussing the food the characters were eating – or cooking! I suppose this is understandable as she made a great name for herself as a cook and restaurant owner.
In addition to gaining responsibility and growing up naturally, it is also vital that we grow up spiritually. In the spiritual realm we may not be instructed to have a solid and persuasive resume or to make sure we keep a strong networking community but we definitely receive instruction. We become responsible for our actions and even the roles we play in the actions of others. Just as we are responsible for the sin we commit, we are also responsible for any assistance we play in the sins of others. Rolling a blunt for yourself is just as bad as rolling a blunt for someone else. I think the most difficult part about the idea of growing up is letting go of all comfort and security we have found in others. We cannot achieve eternal salvation through our mother, father, brother, sister, or anyone else. Growing up causes us to let go of excuses and crutches. I always think about when we make reservations for dinner or events as being what we can’t do spiritually. When someone makes a reservation, someone else who knows the correct information can confirm the reservation. If we go to a restaurant and say, “Hey, my sister made a reservation for….” the receptionist will confirm and direct you to a table. Things don’t work like the scenario shared above in the Kingdom of God. You won’t be able to get eternal salvation through someone else’s relationship with God. Joel 2:28 (KJV): “And it shall come to pass afterward, that I will pour out my spirit upon all flesh; and your sons and your daughters shall prophesy, your old men shall dream dreams, your young men shall see visions.” We each need to have an active, healthy, and personal relationship with the one true living God.
From the Buddhist perspective, Buddhist monk Ajahn Sona agreed that community is an essential part of spiritual practice. He refers to the community as sangha (the spiritual community of people who practice the dhamma). The dhamma, or truth taught by the Buddha, is uncovered bit by bit through sustained practice. Awakening does not occur like a bolt out of the blue for the untrained and unprepared mind - it is instead a journey with many stages.
First I have to say that I admire the women who are stepping up and taking the lead on being connected to Amanda. Kristina, Cindi, and Megan are keeping our mom community informed and keeping us connected to Amanda and her needs as she faces the second hardest day of her life this Friday when she has to bury her little boy.
November 27 - Ken Russell, film director ("Tommy"), 84
He said: "I told the candidates and the parties that they had to abide by the election rules."
Of the more than 200 buildings built in West Fairmount Park for the 1876 Centennial Exposition, only four remain, and two of those – originally built as “comfort stations” or bathrooms – were in dire need of attention before theFriends of the Japanese House and Garden and the City of Philadelphia began an adaptive reuse restoration project in 2010.
Blog – shortened version of Braai Log
6. Using a wooden spoon, mix in the chocolate chips.
“And the person has the right and ability to move by the scale of gunas in both directions.
It says everything about this most special place.
His muscles tensing with every uttered metaphor,
I took it upon myself to paint his t-shirt. I needed to let out some creative energy and drew inspiration from his favorite book.
I found Cate the most predictable character here. It’s a common ploy of crime novelists to have a fair degree of overlap between protagonist and antagonist and I never truly engaged with her. She does her job, metaphorically and literally.
Ok, so I did some reading about the doll. It turns out the doll can (with trouble) stand for short period of time. The joints are all plastic, so no changing of elastic if it breaks. The wigs stay on with some sort of a plug, but the wigs come in various styles and that is a selling point. Especially if you have just as changing mind about what the doll should be like, like I do.
Now. It is rather obvious through your Twitter and Facebook that Celtic is a club that you hold closely to your heart. Compared to other clubs that you support, like AIK, how does this compare and why is Celtic so special?
Aha. Now we're interested, Mr. Spoto. Wouldn't it be nice to see one of these 1923 and '24 efforts, seeing as how this Hitchcock gentleman turned out to be rather a worthwhile filmmaker, in his own small way? "No prints survive"--aw, nuts.
We have a stationery contact who now lives in Japan, and who knows us from the days back when we had a real shop. It’s very simple – he will find the most unusual stationery in Tokyo, hopefully not available here in the UK, and then bring it to you. We hope that each month a box of unexpected stationery will land on our doorstep.
(he comes out naked, covered in Saran Wrap)
Right now, I'm just trying to be honest with my emotions and with myself. Ahhh how I love these little doses of reality.
Log onto to your facebook now & let start spreading word!;)
He has been urged, as head of Christendom, as protector of the Church and defender of the faith, to wipe out the faith of the Turk, and the urging and exhorting have been based on the wickedness and vice of the Turks. Not so! The emperor is not head of Christendom or protector of the Gospel or of the faith. The Church and the faith must have another protector than emperor and kings. They are usually the worst enemies of Christendom and of the faith, as Psalm 2:2 says and the Church constantly laments. With that kind of urging and exhorting things are only made worse and God is the more deeply angered, because that interferes with His honor and His work, and would ascribe it to men, which is idolatry and blasphemy.
Next up on the hop is Dawn. You will love what she has to show you today! Thank you for stopping by and taking a peek! Have a great April Fools!
1 acceptable
The whole process was E.A.S.Y. Printing off this poster was also cheap, I mean cheapity, cheap, cheap. I am super thrilled with how it turned out and would recommend this project to anyone.
Today I am going to go over some layering outfits for men. So if you are a man and you don’t know what layering is… I’m not surprised. it could be a shirt, vest, and a tie. Or it could be a shirt and a sweater.
Paper?
Some things come to an end – they do!
The notion behind the idea of Time's Arrow is that time is linear. That it goes in one direction. A smashed plate does not re-form, if we fall we can't "untrip", an unborn baby is born, but a person that ages and dies cannot reverse the process.
Brewday is pencilled in for Friday 27th.
What I had of this story at this point was all mashed around in a Google Doc. Now, I love Google Docs – I like sharing documents with other people who can read them and comment on them or edit them along side of me. But it lacked the organizational extras of Scrivener. So I gave in, downloaded the free version of Celtx and started transferring stuff over. I hit a few annoying patches where the program wasn’t doing what I wanted it to or I didn’t know how to do something – and couldn’t find help. But it still holds a promising feel.
It was great to talk to someone who is 84 and retains a passionate and expert interest in cookbooks and she still loves to delve into them. But she is also hip with Michael Pollan and agrees with a lot of what he says. She has no time for gladiatorial cooking on TV or celebrity chefs unless they are like Rick Stein and really know their stuff. If she had to eat out she would still choose French cuisine which she has always loved.
all our stories are, were and will always be,
So, one of my best friends shared her experience of meeting a little girl who was celebrating her "Gotcha Day/Adoption Day/Family Day" in Barnes and Noble the other day while she was working. The little girl was from Ch**a, too. And Stacie got to talk to her and share in her special day. Then she wrote an amazing post on her blog about it.
At St Thomas’, however, I was driven into the manuscript, and it welcomed me with all the exclusive, excluding cosiness of a private club. A manuscript is a not just a sanctuary; it’s a portable padded cell with all mod cons.
So what’s a good season for us? If we’re to gauge it by current spending power then a top five finish should be about right. But that was before we lost two international midfielders for a whole season, and went three months without all four full-backs.
Fiction: The Narnia series, Animorphs, Where the Wild Things Are…
And if I can't do those amounts, we surely can't even consider adopting.
If your child cyber-bullies, have the child apologize and make amends. Give an appropriate related consequence, depending on what happened.
November 30, 2011 ~ Application is faxed to adoption agency and they sent us an email saying that they have officially accepted us! Got the contract signed and overnighted to the agency so they will have it the next day. Up next...Homestudy!! aaahhhhhhhh!
I'm asking you to help ransom a child.
“During a speech, Hook told an audience of about 150 he had been asked by Limerick mayor Jim Long to join a campaign to change Limerick’s nickname from “Stab City” to “Fab City”.
Amusingly enough, Wikipedia doesn’t have much on this album, save for its presence in the 1,001 Albums book:
Thank you to Log Cabin for sponsoring my post about updated traditions in my household. To learn more about Log Cabin Syrups (which are all free of High Fructose Corn Syrup), breakfast for dinner, and other new ways to update traditions in your home, click here.I was selected for this sponsorship by the Clever Girls Collective, which endorses Blog With Integrity, as I do.
My husband, Matt asked me the other day when I was going to post on my blog again. My reaction was a mixture of surprise, "Wow, you actually DO read my blog!?!" and fear, "hmmm....I've been WAY too busy to blog, or to take any good pictures of the stuff I've been making lately, I've got nothing to blog about!!!".
Collectively, the Government has embarrassed itself about these things many times before, such as forming ‘research groups’ or ‘think tanks’ which contained Islamic extremists who were more radical that those being investigated This sort of thing happened with the founding of the Muslim Council of Britain in 1998 – this being the best-known balls-up.
Magical Gift: When she touches stone she can feel the memories of the surrounding area.
It will not be easy for him. He will have to change the reason that he cuts stone. Perhaps little, personal monuments- like polished gravestones will make him feel better. We will always need them.
And there it is—two gifts in one! Vive le zombie romance.
1233 **D-II/6/1996. “Student Services and Disservice.” Memorandum to the Faculty, The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1997(9), above, pp. 121-24.)
Now I had a real love/hate relationship with him. This was the project that was "frogbound" last month and Sergei ended up taking a couple of "test flights" around my Living room as a result of that! I put him aside for a little bit, tried to find something else that I thought Michelle would like but I went back to him and I was so happy that I did. This is my very first Plum Street Sampler stitch but I know it won't be my last. I know "Olga" is destined for one of those boxes I shared in my last post!
So , when I see a factory destroyed… and see reports of depleted uranium being exploded into vaporized clouds … and then see the news “fall off the map”… that raises my suspicions.
The votes are in! And I have to say that it was really, really, close. The quality of the entries was just so high, I knew that I'd have to go back to the drawing board with my (non) entry. My inexperience is totally showing here. But I'm learning so much from everybody since I started blogging a year ago. Anything I want to know about writing? I can find right here in the blogging community. And everybody is so supportive. And, I just want to say, THANK YOU!
The second ship’s journey was much longer. I am fortunate to not have gotten seasick, as several of my traveling companions did. I did what I could to sooth them, and it helped them on most days to not throw up. But we did sail through one squall that even my assistance was futile in keeping their dinners in. Even I felt a tad queasy, but the sailors on the ship kept us afloat and did their work commendably.
And freedom tastes of reality,
Then on to THORNABY LIBRARY, a sixties building in the shopping centre which is quite iconic for authors. This - pre-austerity - was where the Public Lending Rights Offices were based. Despite best efforts by the library team, daylight blazed in though the library’s plate glass window, bleaching out all the slides. So I went back to my usual method of Voice Only, plus a few pics and props and a good time was had by all, I think! The Year 6's from THORNABY C of E PRIMARY and CHRIST THE KING RC PRIMARY were excellent fun!
I made a collage with only the pictures from the second row, and placed the persons a bit different to create more balance.
You might think it's just a campaign-related sign stuck on a fabulous piece of art, but it means so much more than that, at least to me. It makes me grin every time I see it.
Lost coast designs unmounted rubber stamp sheet "MINI FLYING LADIES"- 15.00 BRAND NEW
I would say, on a scale from 1 to 10, my nerdiness falls somewhere around 7.6.
Thomas Foley, 32, West Nyack, N.Y.
She came out of school in much the same vein – very solemn, very pale. She didn’t say much on the way home and had a MASSIVE meltdown as soon as we got home – guess she saved it up. Fortunately T got out of the way quickly, she was very cuddly afterwards.
My final response, which caused him to "bitch about us and talk shit" about me and my family according to X:
Gorgeous Sisters・・・Eve & Hime(Chihuahua)
This Thursday Say What is rather simple, and turkey-related en plus!
What does this really mean? Let’s say your mother’s tax basis is $100,000, but the house is now worth $400,000. If the mother gifts half of the house to you, your basis is $50,000. Unless you live in the house for two out of the five years before it is ultimately sold (in which case you could exclude up to $250,000 of any profit), you will have to pay capital gains tax.
This high intensity aerobic pool work out will do wonders for your cardio-vascular efficiency, and will ensure good ‘definition’ and excellent shape for the muscles that you will be building in the gym.
As batteries die in cell phones and video cameras, here are some links to some interesting Occupy May Day photos, videos and livestreams:
Before Tim’s resignation from the team, Alaska is a picture of consistency and calmness. Always sticking up to the league rules, winning with integrity and always treating their fans and players in the most humane way possible.
The residue heat of the freshly steamed rice does all the work for you, very much like spaghetti cabonara but without all the unnecessary guilts afterwards. If you have had enough of leftover turkey and ham until next Christmas or simply want to hang up your kitchen apron for a few days, this might be just the dish for you.
**I used Gruyere in place of Fontina because I had a block in the fridge. Fontina melts beautifully and would be amazing in this recipe, but, unlike Gruyere, it can be difficult to find unless you are visiting a specialty shop.
Broad brush-strokes, to be sure. But broad brush-strokes are often the way that history paints its gaudier, if more decisive, chapters. Japan, China, Russia, Korea, Poland, Germany, Vietnam, Laos and Cambodia in the 20th century have endured worse broad brush-strokes than almost any part of Africa.
It’s at this very moment I wonder why I’m even friends with this person. Apparently the whole meeting the love of your life is that out of a movie where the radio in the background has now become the soundtrack to your life and the coffee shop and coffee shop workers are a setting and sub-characters to your love story.
20-something: That noise? The car turned on, so I’m sure it’s fine. Road trip!
The INTENTION of this Sat’s PHOTO SHOOT (and what re:spect) is all ABOUT:
When the student is ready, the teacher will appear. And Levon was my teacher, in those few moments.
Alexander, meanwhile, is being fitted for some new traveling robes while Giulia works on the books. He’s off to watch the battle, and while he’s gone, she asks permission to deepen her investigations inRome. He agrees.
I'm not angry with Derick's cousin. I'm not angry with her son, N, or her soon-to-be baby. I'm angry because I don't have that. I may never have it. And that sucks. It hurts. I want to be pregnant. I want to be able to carry a baby. I want to just throw caution to the wind and be completely irresponsible for once. But I can't. Life isn't that simple for us.
There's a reason for that Commandment about honouring your mother and father.
So today, after work, I baked this..finally put it in the oven at 920pm! And by 1030pm it was ready.. I didn't make the crystal rum glaze..but rum syrup glaze instead. Brushed rum syrup all over and waited patiently for it to cool so i can cut a slice and try it! So just a moment ago at 1130pm, i ate a slice and it tasted sooo good!! I love the texture and the hint of rum. It's not the usual dense pound cake but rather moist and 'fluffy' light crumbs. Definitely a keeper! So far i've baked 2 pound cakes from her book and i'm loving it! :)
Happy Birthday, KiKi!
Paul Thomas Anderson, There Will Be Blood
It seems to be a matter of being honest with ourselves about what we value most (like safety vs challenge) and the stuff we can't change (like hard wiring and height) and then working the details around the edges.
“I’m serious. You’d better start getting used to the idea that your head will soon be cut off. Just try to enjoy yourself in the meantime.”
Selevan SG, Hornung R, Kissling GE, et al. Reproductive outcomes in wives of lead exposed workers. PB85–220879. Cincinnati, OH: US National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health (NIOSH), Department of Health and Human Services, 1984: 1–42.
The ADL provided secret files to police agencies when these police agencies were prevented by law from collecting the files themselves,
1, Start making the mousse by melting the chocolate in a heatproof bowl over a saucepan of simmering water. Whilst the chocolate is melting, whip the egg whites to a medium soft peak and set to one side. When the chocolate is fully melted remove from the heat and beat in the egg yolks, liqueur and a pinch of salt.
Up those stairs in that little back bedroom
I'm a big girl, and I want to be treated like a responsible adult.
Karla: Fave TV shows?
It was so beautiful I had to smile.
It finally ocurred to me that maybe God intended this as a wake-up call that life is too short. Maybe we need to reach out to the rest of the community more, help more people get to know God. I find doing that quite difficult, so then it was "How do we do that without making a fool of ourselves?" In Me by Casting Crowns helps a bit on that. "I'll go but I cannot go alone, cause I know I'm nothing on my own. But the power of Christ in me makes me strong ... Cause I'll never get by living on my own ability".
The first unit will be accepted at 10:30AM, and the last unit at 2:25PM. You can sign your unit in and come back later to pick up!
Anyway today I have the Revlon Scented polishes that were realeased last year. You know, I'm actually not sure what the collection was actually called. All the polishes have Fizz in the name.... All the polishes are fruit scents and rather sheer glass flecks.
“Scourge of the Sea”
He left for Mumbai with only Rs 8,000, and slept at the railway station for the first fortnight, where he was taken to be a hijra. He found four young women who let him stay, and told him of a gay bar where, with his androgynous looks, he found work.
Just listen to the lyrics.
07. Midnight Rambler
1. I am 40 and loving it.
She is one of the most independent babies I have ever known. She insists on doing everything herself--which makes mealtime quite fun (insert sarcasm here!). She still doesn't like her spoon and without any teeth, I feel like some days I scramble around for foods that she will eat. And one day she might love something only to spit it out the next. She has been doing better at night but we are still patiently awaiting when she will sleep the whole way through. She used to sleep through most of the night but now when she rolls on her belly, she stirs around and then pops up to start crawling. Then that leads to standing up. Which leads to....well you get the point.
I really loved the bright yellow with the blue. I felt very spring-y!
Use with any regular brownie mix, not premium or fancy varieties.
Organizing production- Grading.. Production Sample FiT FiT FiT
We had a good selection of goodies for the race. Chik Fil A had donated chicken biscuit sandwiches and Einstein bagels provided…well…bagels. There were also fruits and pastries as well as a good supply of coffee. The guys were trying their best to peddle the chicken sandwiches and other goodies before the race, but with little luck. They weren’t aware that a lot of runners won’t eat much before a run or race, especially shorter ones. I had a banana just to make sure I had something in my stomach, but I was waiting until after the race for the better stuff.
Ma queue perd son alcool
I also wish my eyelids were bigger so the lashes will give the same effect on me as it does on Tsubasa :( I found it looked way more dramatic on me...
Belly fat puts women at risk for Osteoporosis Too much abdominal fat can damage women's bones. Though for many years physician's thought that obese women had a lower risk of developing osteoporosis, a recent study has turned this thinking around.
The Klan guy says he’s not a “hate monger.” The Westboro Baptist gal talks about “moral authority.”
For which triathlon’s the hook
Picture this:
Dear friends and customers,
This past weekend I took Theatric to a local (4 hours away) endurance event (a 30-mile Limited Distance and a 50-mile open) as a small tune up ride. We entered the Limited Distance (30-mile) due to weather conditions - unexpected cold spell with rain, snow flurries (yes, in May!) and 40 degree temps. Theatric's 3/4 brother, Synthetic (ridden by my good friend Melody Blittersdorf - also a nominated WEG contender who has just received her invitation to attend a selection trial as a "Wild Card" invitee) was also at this ride, so Mel and I decided to ride together as a team and let our boys have some fun. Both horses breezed the 30 miles and averaged a nice 10 mph speed over the hills and through the bad weather to finish tied for first place. It's always fun to win - especially with such great team mates. We were able to put the horses up, shower and have lunch before noon! There's something to be said about Limited Distance!
Linda Buckley-Archer too promised much with the first two books of her trilogy, featuring Kate, Peter, the 18th century Gideon and the anti-gravity Time-Travelling Machine. (If you look on the net, you will find that the first two book titles have been changed to The Time-travellers and The Time Thief, but I must just get over it!).
D — Women are paid 77% of what men get paid because:
-There is still more snow to come..she whispered to herself..I must do something..
The Nanking Beef and Aniseed Beef Tendon is heaven. When I loved a dish, I couldn’t explain its taste. There’s this taste that’s been left and makes my taste buds to crave the next day. Chow Mein noodles is also yummy. China Chicken is okay but not really distinct.
Eyes: MAC Untitled then Tick: Tock Infinity base in Milky Way. Chinvoi used: Tree applied to outer crease, Poison to lid and Alien blended up to brow. One coat black mascara.
Recipe source: adapted from Living Magazine
In fact, those who promoted contraception claimed it would help marriages;
Also, about the name. Raptorex? What the hell: did you name me after an over-the-counter erectile dysfunction drug? I know you were probably trying to be cute, but I am not going to end up at the bottom of the joke pile along with viagrasaurus. I demand to be re-dubbed “sneaky-hidden lizard,” whatever that translates to in Latin.
But knowing that we'd be eating a ton for dinner, I wanted to use something a tad lighter than your typical store-bought pound cake.
Expect young children to ride a little unpredictably or swerve from side to side. It’s too much fun for them to resist so be alert and consider slowing down whenever you pass a small child. Don’t forget to wave, ring your bell, or say “hi”.
Anyway - the piece de resistance is the view. A sliding glass door opens onto a little patio. The patio gives way to a little ribbon of grass, and beyond is a gently bubbling, fountain-sped manmade creek burbling along! A small wooden pallet bridge is two steps from my patio. The creek spreads out to a pond to the left, where the fountains and the ducks play, and then meanders off between grassy banks, dotted by the occasional scenic rock. There is even a gentle knoll... atop of which is growing... yes... a willow tree. Not Old Man Willow, but as I have said many times in other places, I expect Goldberry to come around the corner, dripping green and gold, any second. There are no lilies... I imagine she has already gathered them. And no, that photo above is not my willow. I don't have photos yet, but I will when my dad figures out how to forward me the pictures.
“Live Each Day As If It Were Your Last…
And even more at risk? The trans kids. A whopping one in five trans-identified children winds up homeless before the time they hit eighteen. And these kids are terribly at risk.
I read a poem by Tesfu, who sadly did not continue with the sessions. Here is the opening of his poem about food.
Watch this space as all becomes clearer…
Alighting, a blast of autumn sent a flurry of feathers
And so the day went. Blowfish hung out in his office, reading a little, watching a little tv, doing a little surfing, and later, taking a nap. We had arrived at a truce. Sort of. He will never do all the recommended things science directs one with a cold to do. Never. I could provide him with every medical directive, every internet video, every scientific graph on this issue and he would still cling to the same beliefs he held at 5. He believes he should be in the center of the sofa, in the center of the house, being the doted on center of attention of all because he has a cold. He will miss his mother. A lot.
All this, and the twilight of American empire that gives it its context and importance, will be central to a series of posts I plan on beginning here in the not too distant future. In the meantime, though, there are a few more points about magic I want to discuss, and weave back into the discussion of Green Wizardry that has guided this blog for almost a year and a half now.
I mean, yeah, I know people know that, but damn, it gets COLD in Norway. And sometimes my goosedown duffle coat just doesn't quite cut it. Sometimes, you need to go old skool.
I hope everyone is well and having a great spring.
Article 7 An agriculture administrative department at the county level or above shall strengthen the collection of information about the safety of places of origin of agricultural products and shall establish complete monitoring archives of the safety of places of origin of agricultural products.
All our lives, we keep looking for indulgence. We give all our energy to get to that elusive big red cherry and oh! life would be so much more simple, so much more fruitful if only we could get to that cherry, even hold it for a while. We concentrate so hard on the protagonist that we neglect to pay any attention to the plot or the hidden subtexts. And what happens when we do get to that red cherry? We are ecstatic, no doubt, but for how long does the enthusiasm last? When does the euphoria give way to fear? The fear of not being able to hold on to it anymore. And what if we never make it to the red cherry? Do we live our entire lives in fear of not achieving the goal we set out for?
I was paraphrasing but Romney’s question actually went like this:
Doin the Happy Dance...
Jean Smart (Guinevere)
The springtail fossil pictured was obtained from the Baltic amber beds in Poland.
If there is one thing that this series did worse than the previous one, it’s probably in this apartment. The characters are as good as ever, but just in terms of new characters it was worse. The ones it did add were certainly good – some were fantastic, I only need to go back to the Four Devas Arc, but nothing really shocking in this apartment. It’s kind of hard to fault this show for not introducing more characters though, as they already have so many that it’s hard to keep count.
Johnny Cash, Eminem, Radiohead, and Weezer. Quite an eclectic mix. I’ve also been listening to a lot by a musician named Alexander.
Hey, I have not posted anything in quite some time, but I wanted to share my bandcamp page for my music (Future Trends) where I will be selling my new album Dangers of the Night. If you like you can head over there and stream the whole album for free: Click Here —›
I had the great pleasure of demonstrating some advanced fact-checking tools for Andy’s JOMC 457 students/editors. As our students have hundreds of terrific resources available to them, the first thing I did was create a web page of UNC and North Carolina resources relevant to their needs.
What have your kids done for 100th Day of School projects?
The BNP demands an end to the destruction of Britain’s green belt, caused primarily by housing demand fuelled through mass immigration; and
As horrific as that may sound, I’m having a lot of fun with it, and the message I want to convey especially – people walking in and out of your life, lessons learned from them, etc – is something that I will admit means a lot to me. I’m enjoying the attempting action scenes, the plot development, and the character development, especially. Hopefully, when it’s done, it’ll come out to be a blend of action and plot that I can work with. It’s to be a graphic novel, webcomic (this is the most likely one), or maybe an animation if I sharpen my skills there, and I’m planning on putting as much work into this as possible. This won’t be a project that I give up on so easily.
Here is the base color I used for this mani. It's a pastel pink creme from the brand Astor. The name of the polish is actually a number, it's 133. This polish is part of a spring limited edition (2012).
chemicals in most makeup have been tested for safety,
There are small caves built into the side of the cliffs. These use to house monks that regularly lived and prayed on site. Most of the holes are still there, just inaccessible, but I found it a little amusing to see the little doors in the middle of a cliff wall (they're there to protect cave art and artifacts).
The family have lived in Chadderton for 16 years, and Mrs Howard and her husband, Joe, also have two other children, aged eight and 12.
My favourite author in the whole world is Anne Tyler, so when I heard she was giving her first interview for 37 years at the Sunday Times Oxford Literary Festival, I was first in line to buy my ticket. At the last minute, I suddenly worried she wouldn't live up to my expectations, that for some reason I'd be disappointed, and my devotion to her books would be tarnished as a result. Anyway, surely an author's work should speak for itself; what she's like as a person is immaterial. Why did I want to see her, when what mattered to me was her writing? I was curious, I suppose, and wanted my own personal image of Anne Tyler, some mysterious essence not divulged in her books. Maybe I also wanted to make an impression on her myself, try to communicate some of the pleasure her books have given me over the years. Walking into the Sheldonian shortly before the talk was due to begin, I passed a slim, grey-haired woman waiting outside who glanced at me briefly. I looked into her expressive, intelligent dark eyes - and that was it, my Anne Tyler moment. She was probably thinking about the interview ahead and hardly noticed me but, for a few seconds, we connected. That image of her is all mine. I still can't work out why it should be so significant, but it is, and I'll keep it in my head when I re-read her books.
People tell me I’m really good at marketing because I’ve been writing a blog for years but the truth is I was just a lonely housewife desperate to get published. The fact that I became totally enamoured with all the new technology is another story.
Brett is staying home with the boys whilst this Mummy goes to a Tupperware party with girls.
Every year, young writers and aspiring journalists set forth on a temporary-to-fulltime pilgrimage to find better pastures – in this case, “better skyscrapers and sidewalks”– and the highly coveted job. After all, this is the city where publishers like Conde Nast and Hearst reside and where “if you make it here, you can make it anywhere.” Right?
I woke up in the middle of the night and wrote this in one go before falling immediately back to sleep, maybe two weeks ago. I didn’t even remember doing it until I re-read it almost a week later, and I went, “….Whoa. Holy crap.” So…..yeah. That happened.
16) L’Arpege (Paris, France)
Valentine is the perfect time of the year when each one of us munch lots of chocolates and you find the stores heavily packed with chocolate gift packs,and so many vibrant hearts.Who can resist chocolates?? I can't..Kids or adults,dark chocolates or white chocolates; each one of us love chocolates exceptions apart :-) Though calories does matter for all,but how about this healthy version of chocolate with lesser calories.And a worry free one for kids too and if you have kids who don't like dates or almonds then this is a good alternative too.I tried them with raisins and apricots too,as I love the chocolate covered raisins too.A simple preparation of 10 minutes and I bet all will vanish in no time :-)
Shaped like a lotus ready to blossom, this small covered box is painted by artisan Sakda by hand. Crafted of porcelain the lid and body are adorned with gilded floral motifs. For decorative use only.
1 John 4:7-12 Dear friends, let us love one another, for love comes from God. Everyone who loves has been born of God and knows God. Whoever does not love does not know God, because God is love. This is how God showed his love among us: He sent his one and only Son into the world that we might live through him. This is love: not that we loved God, but that he loved us and sent his Son as an atoning sacrifice for our sins. Dear friends, since God so loved us, we also ought to love one another. No one has ever seen God; but if we love one another, God lives in us and his love is made complete in us.
So what have I learned from studying the numbers? There still is a market for vampire fiction, and probably always will be. Even though I have two strikes against me out of the box, being a new author and having a vampire story in a saturated market, I don’t regret writing THE KEY TO EDEN. Sure it may be a little harder finding an agent, but if I do, I’ll know my story is that much better than the rest. It’s hard standing out in a sea of sparkly vampires, when yours just want to feed. That’s why you’ve got to make sure your story is the absolute best it can be. I’m nearly there, and I can’t wait to share THE KEY TO EDEN with all of you.
So what good is my envy of those within these circles of affection and attention? The only good is that this rotten envy is completely exposed, and when the pain of this exposure compels me to become genuine like these brothers of mine, to live like them, to live in such a way where the natural affection I need flows to me like I am magnetized.
New Belgium Brewing Inc. Loft
My absence even caused me to miss my one year blogiversary last week. This is where I was supposed to make something special to share with you and thank you all for following, reading and commenting on the blog. All these sentiments stand true, albeit a week late, I really have enjoyed sharing recipes and stories with you. So to start making up for lost time, I am giving away a copy of this new cookbook, the Southern Farmer's Market Cookbook, that I just purchased for myself and am anxious to use. I am eager to see how it combines two great loves of mine, southern cuisine and farmer's markets. Just leave a comment on this post by 11:59 p.m Friday evening, telling me your favorite Southern dish. I will pick a winner using a random number generator and send you your very own copy.
I love how it turned out. He's a genius and a sweetheart for doing all that work for something I wanted.
It was undertaken in the contract that the farmers would pay for these radios to be installed at the police stations so that they could maintain direct communications with the SAPS.
Perverted words
We would be 30 weeks gestationally today. Ella is 4 weeks 4 days old.
The card features an image of Bo, the Obama family dog, in front of a fireplace in the White House library with a poinsettia and other decorations. The text reads, “From our family to yours, may your holidays shine with the light of the season.”
Words by Woody Guthrie, Music by Arlo Guthrie
We are in a Fourth Turning, and while there are many places to focus, do not let yourself be weary. You do not have to do everything, but if everyone does something, we will accomplish our goals of small government, less interference into our lives, less taxes and government waste, better quality of life with our families, and true charity among humanity by individuals and not governments. The ills of the world are defeated one family, one community at a time, not by an overreaching federal government mandating social justice. Dig deep, and find your own personal mission, and then live it.
The Templars are a line of Vatican warriors, dating back to the Crusades, who fight demons and other supernatural forces in the age old battle of good forces versus evil. Each knight has a special paranormal skill they use in the battle.
Over the following three years I’d spend idle moments trying to find copies of the Daily Express and its Giles cartoons – even then it was a bit right-wing and not something a pinko ex-student would ever subscribe to. And when I’d managed to track one down, I’d look to see if Giles had used one of my post cards. Then – in ’69 was it? – Prince Charles started to make the headlines with his college revues and his cello playing – and my post cards came to the fore. One view of the college even had three cards juxtaposed. The trouble was, they were the wrong ones: so for one splendid day a national newspaper showed the east range of Great Court alongside the west – and both were on the north side. I rather enjoyed that. But as ever, Giles’s version was a great deal better than the real thing – and that, surely, is a sign of true genius.
The raw beet juice will stimulate your body and mind. Carrot, beets and cucumber juice is a good remedy for allergies.
What emerges most clearly of all in this film is that the Baron’s plans never work because he is incapable, being inhuman himself, of taking into account human behaviour. He never foresees his creations turning upon him, though they generally have sound reasons to do so, and he is likewise blind to his various assistants’ moral qualms. The series charts the decline of a scientific mind into a quagmire of brutishness, due to its inherent blindness to human nature, the very thing it is seeking to master.
Paul Newman (The Verdict)
Water purification companies like Aquatec Rainsoft Ltd of Bristol are already on the case, developing water purification systems for the normal house-hold as well as systems for businesses; to mitigate any contamination that may be present by removing ‘every’ chemical compound from the water supply, and then replacing the essential electrolytes for human health. An Aquatec Rainsoft Ltd spokesperson said today that “Aquatec Rainsoft Ltd prides itself on providing clean, safe, and fresh drinking water for any situation. Tailored to suit most people’s home, business, and budget. We have looked at the possible situation that may arise concerning fracking, and have developed filtration and purification systems that are second to none in their ability to provide the best possible water from whatever the supply.”
Oh well, I really hope I can get my crap together again and not become a band statistic....you know the ones that put on weight or didn't lose anymore.
The recession hit us slowly, draining, but never exhausting our sense of self and purpose. For the first time many of us found ourselves stuck in something. Our “stuckness” rivaled our perception of the “stuckness” of our parents and always tied back to conventionalism. We found ourselves in jobs that we disliked, with partners we found disagreeable, and in apartments we loathed. Our reaction to this turn in circumstances was to carry on or make lateral changes. Because we had been taught to break convention, we could not bring ourselves to turn to convention for comfort.
And, I’ll have more in the future, that’s life, and I’ve just got to get on and deal with it. I'll make my own stories, people like me have to, people like me just do. It’s what makes us stupidly unique; it’s what makes us capable of loving?
An intention can be large and lengthy (I want to become a doctor) or small and immediate (I need to get my resume to XYZ company today!) You can accomplish the latter in a few minutes, but the former will likely take many years. There is no restriction to how many intentions you can set.
The process can be a lot of hard work and take a long time. There are tools to help FSBO sellers manage the complexity, but they do generally eat into the profits from the sale.
During the 1st trimester -You're not sick so don't only consume soup/gator aid/Popsicle's! In the beginning I kept treating my morning sickness as if it was a cold. haha all I wanted was soup and all that did was make me more nauseous. Its just morning sickness try eating those preggie pops or ginger to calm it down, eat light meals.
Of course the smartest thing to do would be to build a permanent trellis over the patio and cover it with deciduous vines. That way there will be shade in summer and sun in winter. So that is also on my mind, thinking about style, type, what sort of materials to use, how much would it cost..... So I'm looking over my garden book collection for ideas.
I learned a great tip from Pinterest. (Pinterest and I have a love/hate relationship - I love it because it is like a worlds fair for crafty women but hate it because it drags me to my computer chair and holds me captive for so long) If you put your phone in a bowl (or down in a fat glass vase with acorns I am saving for a great project) it magnifies the sound like speakers!! Cool, huh??
At first we thought it had to do with him being two years old. Then when it continued, we thought it had to do with Elsa's arrival and his emotional reaction to no longer being the baby of the house. So we hugged and kissed him more and really made an effort to spend one-on-one time with him.
It's all part of the mounting evidence pointing to my impending demise. Optimism: You're at the wrong blog. Still.
Let's move on to the computer. I'm pretty sure I have ten different versions of Fire ans Ice saved on there. Each stage reflects my growth as a writer, but most them are not really helpful or needed.
Then I ended up working a ton of hours at work for two weeks and guess what? Matt rented that super duper jack hammer for only $50 because it only took him two hours to do.
-Tomato seedlings are sprouting. Still waiting for the final two deliveries of seed packages. Need to drive up to the greenhouse nursery and check out their lavender plants, to see if we need to order from them or through the company in Toronto that sells the varieties we want. Next week we should be putting up the hoophouse (a few weeks behind schedule, mainly because everything else is taking TOO DAMN LONG. Tomato plants will be planted mainly in the ginormous hoophouse.
Last week Tuesday when I went to Pick ‘n Pay to get a quote for a flowers, I have three beautiful ladies who are doing the arranging – another blessing – so I only need to purchase the flowers! The lady asked what my budget was for the flowers and I said we couldn’t do any more than a specific amount because otherwise I’m sacrificing my whole fridge budget… She said I’m sure someone will bless you with a fridge! I thought that she was crazy… On Saturday Stefan’s Ouma called me into her room to tell me that she and Oupa would like to give us a brand new fridge for our wedding gift! Amazing! Praise God for His favour and provision!
1.) You can reprint the public domain book. Copy the manuscript and start to make a profit by selling it.
I love a party where you don’t know what the DJ is going to play. I like to be surprised, and hear a song that makes me want to jump up. Since I am out a lot where music is played I can get bored and jaded very quickly. Reluctant Yuppie, Inc is trying to cater the 30 and over crowd, the music lovers, I don’t want to hear the status quo.
Resort visitors and fellow decorating firms labeled it "the laziest thing we've ever seen".
1 tablespoon unsalted butter
Anyway I was listening to the radio and was surprised to hear that while some people live in dread of impending home foreclosures, others are impatient with the banks for not foreclosing on their homes quickly enough. Why? Because the value of their home has dropped so significantly that they do not want to pay their mortgage anymore. They'd rather let the bank take the property so they can buy a similar home at a fraction of the cost.
I’m not sure how I feel about the race taking place in the heat, but I do know that I’m glad our team race is in October. What do you think?
Under new hiring benchmarks set this month, senior Mounties say that new classes of recruits should comprise 30 per cent women, 20 per cent visible minorities and 10 per cent aboriginals, The Globe has learned. If the benchmarks are met, it would be the first time “minority” hires would actually represent a majority of RCMP recruits.
14 ounces fresh noodles, cooked according to package directions (about 9 ounces dried noodles)
Like me. I'm bursting with ideas. I'm not in the slightest bit blocky but somewhere, instinctively, I know that the optimum conditions where my energy levels and creativity come together aren't quite here yet. But it's so close. Every morning I wake up and it's brighter and I feel even better.
I know that a baby will come when it's good and ready, but if I'm going to schedule a c-section then I'd rather do it at a time where I'm not inconveniencing a bunch of other people and their families because they are working extra late each night to make up for being short yet another person. Also, I know my husband and I know he'd be stressed and feel bad that he wasn't there to help out, especially since he's one of the trainers/help people for the new software. It's his job to not only do his regular job, but to be available when someone else needs help or has questions.
Pick Withers : drums
3 provide
The American Redneck is a curious creature and one that I always rely on for a good laugh. I can only imagine what the conversation is like inside that truck cab. I bet it went something like this:
During my ride yesterday morning I saw four deer and I thought, ‘Dude, they have it lucky! Sitting around, eating grass, jumping fences and playing in the river…’
God has uniquely gifted you to bring His presence and power in the area of your calling. Once you begin to realize this, God will use you just as He did Joseph with his employer, Pharaoh. Your life should be a testimony of the power, creativity, and servant-hood of Jesus that it impacts your employer to the degree that he says the same thing Pharaoh said about Joseph: “Can we find anyone like this man, one in whom is the Spirit of God?”
Now, to pick up the other side of the argument for just a second, I’m sure that had the movie not followed the book, I’d be here arguing and complaining that if you aren’t going to follow the material from the book, why even bother making the movie…. and blah blah blah… And I’ll admit that I’m probably the first person to do that when a movie strays from the book as well. However, I think (hope) that after watching Firestarter I’ll be a little more forgiving in the future. Firestarter followed the book, yes, but I think that hurt it in some instances. All in all, any movie adaptation should focus on simply making the story play out the best it can on screen. The more details they can include from the source material, the better, but when it starts to detract from the story that is being told on screen, stop.
Ian Bell is clearly an obnoxious, mendacious lackey of the establishment.
I'll leave you with today's photos, they have nothing to do with fighting, racing, shooting, killing, or explosions but they do make me feel all warm and fuzzy and happy (in honor of having my school drama all taken care of)
This was the palest of my Cinque Terre wines, very lemony straw and fresh to look at.
This is the Master Bath. There is granite countertops that still need to go in and a framed mirror above the vanity. I am in love with the Ann Sacks Penny tile in the shower and I gaze at it lovingly every time we go to the house.
I do believe that Occupy is performing a valuable function in teaching people what real democracy looks like. Maintaining what they call a “horizontal structure” (what the rest of us might call “pure democracy”) not only helps to develop everyone, it helps to make everyone a leader–and therefore immunizes the movement against divide-and-conquer tactics. But I wish that the movement would listen a little more to the old fogies, who were once at exactly the same place that Occupy is, and know what went wrong and why. The old saying goes that if you learn from the past, you get wisdom, and if you don’t, then you get experience.
But Sen. Tom Coburn, Oklahoma Republican and a top taxpayer watchdog, said avoiding the Internet means giving up a valuable anti-fraud weapon — one that he said even federal courts have relied upon in some disability cases.
Let us put it this way: you have a driver's license (that you supposedly got a hold on after giving an exam) and a car. In this case, does anybody drive your sorry ass to where you want to go? No, you drive yourself, because you can! Also, keyboard players are sexy.
So, we decided to work with this agency, Community Youth Services, to become licensed foster parents. We are in the process of getting licensed - a process that seems fast and slow at the same time. There are many ducks to be lined up, but we are close to the end.
For all I don’t know on the topic of what is a safe amount to eat, drink & exercise, there is something I do know. I know that eating healthy and taking exercise is in fact better for you than sitting on your fat arse eating chips. The government advice to do the former and avoid the latter isn’t actually wrong, and advising us of this isn’t restricting our freedom to do the latter if we so choose.
- Lace Ribbon Border #122362
After a lot of contemplation and watching way too many episodes of ‘Hoarders’, ‘American Pickers’, ‘Dancing With The Stars’ and ‘The Bachelor’, the wife and I have come to a conclusion…… This just isn’t worth it.
face our nations
002.194 YUSUFALI: The prohibited month for the prohibited month,- and so for all things prohibited,- there is the law of equality. If then any one transgresses the prohibition against you, Transgress ye likewise against him. But fear Allah, and know that Allah is with those who restrain themselves.
Yellow Pointed Hab 2/2 (Possibly not if this is a rogue seed!)
I've already shipped all of the clothes Sal received as gifts, and my sister-in-law had loaned us clothing up to the 6 month size, so most everything he wears these days will go back to her before we leave. He has a few 6 month outfits that are his to keep, so I won't be taking a naked baby over there. I did stockpile Enfamil and diaper wipes and OTC baby meds for him, but I feel justified in knowing that they all meet US standards. When I heard that the recalled Enfamil from Walmart was found on market shelves in China, that was all I needed to justify sending over a stockpile of non-recalled formula. Piece of mind in a suitcase. Sal is getting away with taking the most over with him--I'm taking children's books, toys and his carseat and stroller with us. Once again, when it comes to child safety, I trust what I know--I can't go on blind faith that a carseat I buy in China is up to par with US standards. I mean, just look at the photo below of something being sold as a carseat. No thanks.
Another thing that really helped me is finding the right thimble. I started with one of the big inexpensive leather ones (the kind with an elasticized knit part at the bottom), but it started to fall apart almost immediately and didn't offer my finger much protection. So a few weeks ago I bought this little golden yellow leather thimble by Clover, and I love it. It has a dimpled metal piece at the finger tip, just like a traditional thimble, but it has a soft leather body so it's super comfortable and flexible. I found it at Joann's for $12.99. It is great.
Cadmium Lemon
(Always Waining on his way to winning the Topham)
Force Commander UNMISS occupy
But, is it really true?
The 50’s rock n roll explosion ended with Elvis being drafted, Buddy Holly, Eddie Cochrane and the promising Ritchie Valens dead. Little Richard went religious, Chuck Berry was beginning his legal battles. Jerry Lee Lewis personal life being the undoing of his professional one. It left a vacuum that was filled with the androgenous teen idols – Bobby Darin, Fabian, Pat Boone.
Like a poet on hold.
I hear the drums beat and the trumpets blowing,
Hospital
Can they save the starving passengers? And what has the fabled Nefaro got do to with the virus?
Anna Grace Young
friend-2: "no worries. we don't have to say anything."
Also turning in a National Record performance was Solomon Haile of Sandy Spring MD with his 14:22.88 win in the 5000 meters - part of a 2 mile (9:02.67) double! And speaking of doubles, Ashton Purvis, Oakland CA, won a sizzling 60/200 double in 7.43/23.37. I've been paying attention to Purvis out here in Cali and she is going to be someone to recon with this outdoor season!
This post will have some copyright-violating pictures of double-page spreads. I am showing these for the purposes of review and comment, OK? And I think these are good books, so I could even suggest you buy them.
To open the door?
You wake up in the morning and you look at your old spoon, and you say to yourself, ‘Mick, it’s time to get yourself a new spoon.’ And you do. –MICK JAGGER
YAY! It took me FOREVER to decide on paint colors for the walls. I picked a dark blue & a lighter teal blue. When I got them on the walls, I didn't like one of them. I thought the color that was supposed to be a lighter blue was too dark. So, I added white to it until I thought it was good. Then I still hated it. Oddly enough my husband liked it.
It’s about a girl called Gong Ah Jung who’s a civil servant working with a boss who likes to take credit for other people’s work. She organizes an event in a park that seems successful and just as she’s reveling in praise from some important people, a swarm of bees attack all the guests and her event is ruined.
I also have linked up with an old friend of mine who is business savy and together we are working on the corporate angles of Zenith Productions, a new line of industry standard promotional videos ‘the question you should be asking is, what Can’t Zenith Productions do for you?’ new website coming soon!
The tart was really yummy and the filling really moist and coconutty. The only problem I had with this tart was that that mangoes kept losing moisture as the day waned... so I would put some sort of preserves on top of the mangoes after the tart is baked to preserve them if you are serving this later... must say this tart didn't last past a few hours! The base was very very soft and biscutty and perfectly paired with the coconut and mango!
I don’t know about you, but after months and trying to figure out what the Browns are going to do at 4 and 22 in the draft, I am as tired as an overweight trucker weaving across lanes on 71 North at 3 a.m. in the fifth hour of his last Five Hour Energy. With a week left before the SuperBowl of the off-season kicks off, the common consensus is that the Brownies will draft a WR with one of their first three picks. This is all well and good because the Brown’s score less than a devout virgin who’s father owns a large assortment of firearms. But the Orange and Brown can’t attach all their hopes and dreams to one new WR. They are going to have to find a sleeper who can contribute in the next few season. Here are four guys who could be available after the third round:
We had won. Or so, we thought. The calls started pouring in. Every door had the same thing happen. The guy is a sadist punk, messing with people's airways for fun. Many people are upset. I was asked by a disabled man to "teach that sucker a lesson", but I do not use violence to enforce what I may think is 'right'. I could have easily just opened the door while he was across from it, and crushed him a bit, but I knew that the negative action would only stick with me.
That saved a wretch like me....
To start, I'm not exactly mathy. I'm one of those unfortunate souls who have a wall with math. If you ask me a math question, I’ll answer you with a blank stare. But I really wanted to figure out how much money I would need to quit my job, so I had to use basic math, which meant I'd start with $100 because even I can multiply by 100.
F: So many people, so many people have fallen by the wayside because of the so called Gurus. And this is a hard spiritual practice to start with…
It is a new life for both of us.
Friday - Mini Meatball Soup - please request beef or chicken this soup comes with all of the meatballs precooked and reasy to drop in, the soup base with ditalini, carrots, and onions, This soup can also be requested pre-made as just a heat and eat.
that is your touch
The website for the charity doesn’t actually give travel directions – probably to ensure the safety of the dogs - so I had to rely on a map and a rough idea of where it was. So, the closer I got the more worried I was that I had missed it altogether when I suddenly saw a road sign that said “Hearing Dogs” – aha!!
*NOTE: ALL emphasis above is blogsensebybarb.
Pour water in pot and bring to a boil. Add turnips, kei chic, yuk chuk and longan fruits. Boil for one and a half hour. Add salt to taste and turn off the heat. The Vegetarian Chinese Herbal Soup is best eaten with steam rice.
A voice came echoing out from the night
I'll explain what I mean. To find instructions for putting together cake ball pops, click here. Follow all of the steps up to the point you shape the cake into balls. At that point, use a heart shaped cookie cutter and stuff the cake inside of it, filling it completely and smoothing out the top and bottom. To remove the cake from the cutter, gently push the shape out onto a cookie sheet:
MAKE A DECISION
High Street
January: $100 from Rewards Central (online surveys), $100 from Roy Morgan Research
My very good friend and fab critique partner, Lori M. Lee, recently tagged me in a writer's meme. I thought it would be a great way for me to dust off the old blog and perhaps jumpstart me into blogging again. *cue party hats and music* In lieu of the usual music stuff I put up for my irregular regular Music Mondays, I thought I'd jump in on the meme fun and take a stab at this instead! xD
It has emerged this morning that Nathaniel Pinney has been released by the club.
and rearrangements:
Your website is ready, your layout and products are organized and you have your best outfit on - now what? Let's review some ways to market your site that are free.
Chapter One - Winners
I will be back next week and hop by everyone's blogs.
Switch From a Wood Burning to an Ethanol Burning Fireplace
If, over the next couple of months, this begins to catch on with other nations, the Dollar's death knell may have already sounded.
6/19 St Paul, MN - Amsterdam Hall
Last but not least, the grand city of Minneapolis, Minnesota, or rather it's northern suburb Brooklyn Center rounds out our arctic tour. Of the 50 largest U.S. cities, the greater Minneapolis metropolitan area (including its equally chilled-out, twin sister St. Paul), ranks as the coldest. According to NOAA, (That's shortcut talk for the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration) Minneapolis had a combined daily, mean temperature of 19º—for the months (yes that's plural) of December, January and February. Holy tundra. Fear not, for Minneapolis (or, again, it's northern suburb Brooklyn Center) also brings us Surly Bender (and the Mary Tyler Moore show). Bender (The name always reminds me of Futurama) pours mahogany, with glints of scarlet, and like the Lakefront, its got a resilient khaki head, as well. You almost know what this beer is going to smell and taste like, simply by looking at it. In the nose, it's cocoa and caramel with a toasted nuttiness. In the mouth, it's a mix of woody-caramel and and black coffee like astringency. There's a creamy vanilla quality that flows throughout the beer, intermingling with the beer's inherent earthiness. There's a slight bitterness to this one, but I think it comes more from its dark malt rather than its hops, it's a mellow bitterness that reminds me of semi-sweet baking chocolate, rather than a typical, sharp hop bitterness. Bender is quite honestly, one of the best American Brown Ales I've ever had.
With it’s “ripped from the headlines” plot centered around a family of drug dealers and murderers, Animal Kingdom is a very dark and unsettling movie than engages you in the characters from the very start and is actually inspired by the true story of the Pettingill family when Trevor Pettingill was acquitted of murdering two police officers in Australia during the late 80′s. This movie never lets you warm up to the family or feel safe about them (all except for Jay), even with a couple of them having a likeable personality it’s made clear from the beginning how dangerous they are. As soon as the movie gets going all of the key protagonists are introduced as the main character Jay (James Frecheville) reflectively narrates in the opening scene on his first meeting with his estranged Grandmother and four Uncles. Almost immediately there is a sense of danger just below the surface surrounding all of these family members that only gets stronger as the story progresses, and by the end I was shocked at just how dangerous and unpredictable they really were. The acting in this movie was so great from everyone, and I really could feel the uneasiness that was always there which only intensified from something as simple as a glance or a passing comment full of subtext that lets you know something bad is about to happen. The movie opens with Jay sitting on the couch in his apartment next to his unconscious mother, there is obviously something wrong with his mom this scene but Jay seems more interested in watching a game show on the television. After a few moments pass the paramedics arrive and he lets them know she has overdosed on heroin, but still only seems mildly interested in his mom’s health when he only glances over every few seconds but still seems more interested in what’s going on with the TV game show, but it turns out worse than he thought when she’s pronounced dead. This opening scene I interpreted as suggesting that this is obviously a common occurrence that he’s used to by now and doesn’t realize his mom died right next to him, maybe it is a disconnection from his drug addicted mom or something else in the back story that’s never revealed but he doesn’t seem too shaken up by his mother’s passing. Of course from the start it’s easy to see that Jay is a very quiet person who never reveals his feelings. Being a minor and unsure what to do he tells the medics and police he is over 18 and then calls his grandmother Janine (Jacki Weaver) who takes him in to live with her.
The Marine Corps will allow women to enroll in its infantry course for the first time in its more than 200-year history, according to news reports.
3 tablespoons of fake butter
No.5 on a summation series:
7. Salt as per taste.
Anything I needed to say.
Oh, and one of my favourite games at the time, that I played in the privacy of my own room on my ZX Spectrum was....'My name is Uncle Groucho, you win a fat cigar'. Seriously. Catchy game name, huh?!
My thoughts were brought to bear the other day-it’s strange where the mind wanders after a 10 hour bender-on the past and future prospects of these little beauts. A day’s drinking had seen scant evidence of these practical aids, aside from a scattering of what purists would dismiss as keg beer mats. And, by that, I don’t mean they advertise keg although, of course, some do.
Zapatos: Tea Dye, Vintage Photo, Walnut Stain
Em is doing well although she just wiped out this afternoon and cut her lip. She's desperately trying to be bipedal, I don't think she rates the all fours thing much. I now get the want for eyes in the back of one's head. She's going to be hard work once she starts locomoting at faster speeds.
2 July 1941: 2215 hours: * * * The Commander in Chief reports from Riga as follows: 67 men were killed and 15 murdered of the advance detachment Lasch which had crossed to the east bank The commander in chief has ordered that all Russians captured in Riga must be shot in retaliation.
In a statement, China’s State Administration of Radio, Film and Television explained the reason for the censorship — and it wasn’t due to an aversion to nakedness. ‘Considering the vivid 3D effects, we fear that viewers may reach out their hands for a touch and thus interrupt other people’s viewing. We’ve decided to cut off the nudity scenes,’ the agency said.’
Two things work for me during such times: Chili and humor. As I was brewing up a batch of my homemade chili, I got to thinking of the story of Frank, the yankee judge who accidentally found himself judging a Texas chili cook-off.
Raven said that he had nought to quarrel with therein;
A wise person once said that good humor comes from pain. I don't have a whole lot of funny stuff happening in my life these days, because I'm happier so things don't need to be made humorous for me to cope with them anymore.
Did you watch tonight's Mets game? I'm sorry. I did too.
but unfortunately, I can't share it with you yet.
"Swastika Girls"
unheard by the trees
May his memory be eternal!
So long before I knew you
4.) I've had a lot of things on my mind that I would like to write about but they have the potential to be controversial and I just don't really feel like going there. Maybe I will... but only if people play nice. Disagree, but disagree nicely haha.
To purchase your copy of the Queensland Good Food Guide 2012, click here - it is available in a number of formats - hard-copy book, iphone app, digitally, ebook, and finally, as a website subscription.
SO SUE ME. I've never had an experience where I regretted being educated on a current event (besides maybe the 72 day Kardashian marriage) In complete seriousness, humans need to be doing more to take care of each other, and the first step is knowing how and where.
In the exercise I’m describing, the audience has to pick one person’s plan to implement but because they’ve all gone through the thought process of how they would do the task, it’s a straightforward decision and the activity proceeds very quickly. We know in real life that things never quite go according to plan, and this can happen in the simplest of tasks. Yet because my audience are so engaged in the task, it’s easy to get back on track. Individuals will often act on their own initiative because they understand intuitively what needs to be done.
New Years Eve and Valentine’s day are 2 days that consistently disappoint most people only because they have arbitrarily high and unrealistic expectations. Americans especially have been conditioned by movies, popular culture and personal experiences to expect grand (often times uncharacteristic) romantic gestures on VD, and a crazy, upscale (also usually uncharacteristic) NYE.
For one week, it's okay to ignore them. Sometime on November 6th (I think), I put a note on my Facebook about my progress, and someone responded with 'I don't think you quite understand the concept of a month.'
my fingers purple. bursting wineskins
Tending bar at the safari guesthouse, I overhear a Rasputin-like character telling everyone that the world will end in 2012. Accursed fool! Apocalyptic blabbering of that sort is tremendously harmful for our tourism industry, because people never visit Africa when they know their days are numbered. India has pretty much cornered the last-hurrah market thanks to its mystics and gurus, who can offer gullible visitors a final shot at enlightenment. In Africa we only have witchdoctors, who can offer gullible visitors potions that will make their eyebrows bushy.
Spitzer’s 2001 study was a surprise and created a media firestorm because he had previously led the charge in 1972-73 to remove homosexuality from the list of mental disorders in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual (DSM) of the American Psychiatric Association (APA). Spitzer, now 80, admits he was proud of having been instrumental in removing homosexuality from the list of mental disorders.
Deadline to be considered for the weekly "Chic of the Week" is 9:00 PM EST on Thursday, December 2cd. The Inlinkz form will close at that time. Our top pick "Chic of the Week" will be announced on the following Friday morning.
For some unknown reason, I’ve never read a Randy Singer title before. After reading The Last Plea Bargain, Singer is now firmly on my ‘must read’ author list. This novel had me on a complete rollercoaster ride. So many times I thought I knew where it was headed, only to be proven completely wrong a couple of pages later. Without giving too much away, the final twist made my jaw drop. I had to make notes to see how everything connected, but everything was plausible and made a great point about how power and weakness can both send a person on a very dangerous path.
This comedy takes its title from the non-fiction pregnancy book of the same name and follows five couples in the Atlanta area during the pregnancy stage. There doesn’t seem to be much else in the way of plot to be honest but it’s the cast that draws me in- Cameron Diaz, Jennifer Lopez, Matthew Morrison, Elizabeth Banks, Brooklyn Decker, Joe Manganiello, Dennis Quaid, Chris Rock, Anna Kendrick and Chace Crawford. With a cast like that, it’s got to be awesome, right? I reckon the stories will interweave like Valentine’s Day. The trailer looks pretty funny and let’s not forget about Cheryl Cole’s cameo as a talent show judge. Cannot wait to see that.
I've been trying to prepare more food at home to avoid ordering food at work. I came to this decision when I realised I'd eaten McDonald's four times one week! McDonald's and KFC deliver here, and they have English language order lines (that can tell where you are by locating the phone so you don't need to know the Chinese address!) which means that all us foreign trainers use it a lot as it's something we can do ourselves instead of having to get our Chinese co-workers to do it for us. I'm not going super hardcore with it as I can't really read the nutritional info and the ones that actually have info only show kilojoules instead of kilocalories, so it's more a case of trying to make the best choices of what I'm offered. I can be difficult when you can't read menus to find something reasonable, so things have been a bit hit or miss, but I don't want to stop eating out with people as the social aspect is really important. It's so easy to become isolated here and I don;t want that to happen.
when you may be found.
Tonight was a fairly easy one as my knee is twinging a little bit, think I might have twisted it slightly on Sunday, so thought I'd give it a rest.
the Middle of the month. Its like a bonus prize. So don't miss out!!
Fuller, Tucker, Walker are all synonyms for this process. So people with these surnames had a distant ancestor who fulled cloth.
A roof over our heads
‘Since the baby was not properly screened, TSA officers began to look for the family in the secure area of the terminal,’ Ms Davis said.
I have no idea what adjustments should have been made, but maybe given Flower’s struggles (more on that in a moment), Disco should have gone to a defensive shell like the one he employed last year when Sid and Geno were both injured. I hate to say it, but again the Flyers were the better, faster team; in cases like this, the slower team ordinarily has to rein in their forecheck and go into a more-conservative system of Defensive Zone coverage.
This is another one of those budget-priced packages that gives you exactly what you pay for: You pay a cut-rate, you get four cut-rate movies.
1/4 t pure lemon extract (I sub with fresh lemon juice)
There really were no points on which my editor's suggestions differed. Laura's revisions weren't as drastic--thanks to the fact Lucy had already helped me shape the book into much of what it is. My editor mostly had me add information. She wanted me to answer world-building questions, add some new chapters, deepen some of the relationships more, stuff like that. Actually, during my revisions for Laura, the book gained a lot of weight. ORIGIN went from 80,000 words to 105,000!
Arena 2: This match is interesting in that Aria and Erio are pretty strong compared to the rest of the newcomers that appeared this year. It would be interesting to see how this match was going to go. Aria has her Kugimiya faction by her side, but Erio is by no means a pushover and is a popular moe blob in the current world. By far, there is going to be a struggle as to which one of them is going to win. I think Erio may just edge out Aria and by a decent amount of votes on that note.
you just flow
Rule One: I will not be dissuaded by zombies or trolls.
Kept Inside, as Secrets Hide…Love Abides
Pale Chocolate
knitting/crochet/quilting
If you're in San Francisco, you surely already know from the public advertisements, the press coverage, and the convivial lines forming outside the Kabuki and other festival venues, that the 55th San Francisco International Film Festival is in full swing. Although I haven't written much about the festival here at Hell On Frisco Bay as of yet, I wrote a few quick capsule previews for 7x7 last week. I'm actually not in San Francisco right now, as I'm attending another festival in another town (Albuquerque), but I'll be back tomorrow and am excited to get into the swing of attending screenings at my hometown fest.
Photo: Buying souvenirs for the dear girls!
Overall Rating:3.5 out of 5 bros
~ Put marinated chicken onto a piece of aluminium foil and wrap up.
-a drawing meant to apologize to me for being rude
X had taken criticisms of his teaching method – and I cannot say there weren’t racist remarks, but that said, the vast majority of our class was non-White and thus, I doubt it, especially in our field – and assumed it to be more oppression of the usual kind – that he was not ‘White enough’ to teach. In turn, he lashed out, retreating away from us, instead of working collaboratively with us to make the learning experience successful for all. It was sad, scary and a shame to see: sad, in that I felt sympathy for the fact that it probably had happened that X had been told he wasn’t ‘White enough’, never mind the mistreatment of the Aboriginals and its toll; scary, in that someone with so many years experience teaching how to avoid this behaviour was exhibiting it in our class; and a shame, because we all lost an opportunity to learn from each other. When I offered my feedback, for example, I had commended the uniqueness of what X offered, while suggesting what I and perhaps others needed to create a bridge and help us learn; it was offered constructively, as collaborators in the learning process. That opportunity was spurned and shunned. I in turn lost out on the wealth of experiences and knowledge X could have given me for my social worker tool box.
Billy's Bakery
With nearly two weeks of our family being sick around here we have had quite a lot of thinking time. A time to consider what is really truly important in life.
Together with Well-Met in Kith’takharos, this introduces the factions and themes the PCs will face in the campaign as it continues; the Transit Guild, the Order of the Jade Leaf, reptile men, and outlaws.
While you are here be sure to pick up all the co-ordinating freebies I have on my blog to go with this kit!
The next morning, Yi Gak and Se Na meet in front of his fake grandma’s house. He tells her to get lost and that he’d deal with the broken engagement on his own. Inside, he meets with grandma and Tae Mu and his dad and she brushes off any talk of the disengagement. All she cares about is preparing Tae Yong for the role of CEO which infuriates Tae Mu and his dad since they don’t think he deserves it. She tells them to lend their support.
to connect with the higher state of global consciousness,
Interesting question. I outlined Winter’s Shadow quite extensively and didn’t outline Winter’s Light at all. The difference can be seen in the two novels. Winter’s Shadow is much more tightly contained, it adhers closely to genre conventions and has a distinctly familiar paranormal rythmn to it. On the other hand, Winter’s Light is a great big sprawling beast. Scene to scene, I didn’t know what was going to happen before I wrote it which I think lends the story an unpredictability – a sense of danger. Anything can happen (and does).
Other issues that Richard Hooper mentioned are:
Beginning this evening and continuing until Friday, May 16, 2008, artwork created by students from Halton’s seventeen public high schools will be showcased in an art exhibition titled State of the Art. The annual event will take place at Gary Allan High School, 3250 New Street in Burlington.
Anyway, I'm using my 10yo daughter as something of a sounding board on plot development. (I'm going for more of a YA theme here) She's been a great help because her imagination is still young and bright, where mine tends to atrophy a bit over time.
The next few days were busy working to locate boat parts and do some grocery shopping. On July 9 we decided to move into a marina so that Steve could pull our transmission. We were required to have a Fisheries diver check the bottom of our boat and also put some treatment in our thru hulls. The next day we left for Bay View Marina, which required going up a river with all sorts of boats anchored in the middle of the channel. Entering the marina also required entering a lock. After we were inside the lock, the dock master Trevor closed the lock to the river, filled the lock, and then opened the lock to the marina. It was our first time to do this, and it was very interesting.
I babysit a lot.
If you are looking to purchase a stair lift and are worried about getting one to fit because you have a curved, odd shaped staircase or multiple landings  dont be! Curved stair lifts are just what you need.
I am taking this back a bit today. Posting some of those songs that have guided me to the music taste I have now. The songs I listened to in high school and the vinyl my parents had laying about the house.
Using John and Caitlin Mathews StoryWorld cards, we experimented with coming up with new story ideas. This pack of cards includes many fantasy and traditional fairytale characters, objects and settings along with a book to show different ways they could be used.
i didn't lie!
I swear I am just as crazy as the guy in a straight jacket! Seriously, though! Why would I doodle a guy holding a girls hand and write the most corniest poem next to it? Because I am insane and I have no head on my shoulders. I wish he would call me querida, maybe a secret name like his little sparrow. Something, ya know! But no because he has too much class that makes a college guy anything but boring. His smile makes me want to throw my arms around his neck. His laugh haunts my ears. I nearly melt when he is mad at me and calls me by my name.
Bonny Doon Erbaluce- Erbaluce (err-ba-loo-chay) is an obscure white grape from Italy’s Northern Piedmont region. It produces acidic wines with ample fruit- lots of lemon, white peach and a little pear and apple, with some underlying herbal tones . The taste is fresh and crisp. It would make for yet another excellent summer wine on a nice warm day.
Then, this afternoon, while researching agents in the city (special thanks once again for the continuous generosity and kindness of my past acting mentor) and looking for day jobs within the arts world, I was made aware of a blog post by Augusta Supple, Working with Playwrights Write Here Write Now which quoted an earlier post of mine [http://ildikosusany.wordpress.com/2012/03/14/day-sixty-two-of-366/] regarding Augusta’s Write Here, Write Now playwriting sessions. I thanked Augusta for recommending my blog to her followers and that is when she tweeted this: “Well from where I’m sitting Ildiko Susany you are one of the hardest working artists in the business, you are definitely worth watching!” It was such a lovely comment to read and it is very nourishing and uplifting to feel as though I am working hard and to hear that some people are actually noticing my work! I hope that it keeps on coming!
So it was by the time of constructivism, or wasn’t…:
Bake for about 15 minutes, or until the chicken is cooked through. Let the chicken rest on the rack for about 5 minutes before serving.
But hey! He does have some OUTSTANDING features!!!
Here's the quick version of the birth story. On Sunday afternoon, we went for a walk and returned home at about 6pm to cook dinner. As I was cooking, I realized that I was having fairly regular contractions, about five minutes apart from the beginning. We ate dinner and cleaned up and I put Riker down to bed. By the time I left the room, I was having contractions every three minutes or so and we called our midwife and doula to let them know what was happening. Our doula (the friend who was away all of last week and thankfully back in time) came over and found that I was 4 cm dilated at 11pm. She thought we'd better get to the Birth Centre so we called Riker's nanny to come over and spend the night at our house and then got in the car for the twenty minute drive to the hospital. We arrived just before midnight and I was ready to push almost as soon as we arrived. The midwife had drawn a warm bath and about half an hour later, the baby was born in the bath. It was an amazing and empowering experience and I am extremely grateful to the baby, my body and my support team for the quick and efficient birth!
Being able to win games when key players aren't at their best is something I talked about in my last posting.
Vic Venturi
When I worked at the Women's Research Institute at BYU Bonnie Ballif-Spanvill and Valerie Hudson were just getting the WomenStats Database under way in full swing. The database documents of women's rights and women's social, political and family situations in every country in the world. With the data base they were hoping that they would be able to show that the economic and political stability and growth of a country was directly related to how well women were treated and valued, which is exactly what they found. The implications of their findings is enormous and I can't wait to see what else comes out of this, hopefully towards creating a better world for women and one in which the perpetuation of life (and those who create it) is more highly valued.
Happy Holidays Everyone!
so I am sure you can appreciate why I have nothing creative to share.
SSgt Bales chose to kill chilren as well, and that is equally as evil - but no war has ever been fair and square - if any Govt, sends its people into battle, it must do all it can to prevent atrcities - did the Americans do alll they could / all they should to prevent Bales losing it?
Gotta go get my kids in bed... we are all happy and tummys are full thanks to Debbie Hyde who fed us a wonderful dinner.
In May 2008, an angry motorcyclist punched a kwaZulu-Natal provincial VIP driver after the VIP driver crashed into the back of another car, seriously injuring its occupant, on the N3 near Camperdown.
During highschool, Obari had a friend in class called Urushihara Satoshi who would often be carrying the 3 pegged sheets of paper animators use to draw on. Curious about this, Urushihara told him to draw using it and when Obari saw how simple his drawings could be made to move and come to life, he was instantly hooked. Following on, Obari became determined to learn about how anime was made and over the summer holidays Obari used money he had gained from part-time jobs, and decided to book appointments with various studios and meet with the animators face to face. Back then he did not realise that you could go to special art schools and technical colleges for learning animation and instead chose a more unorthodox direct method, which somehow managed to pay off.
John 1:1-5 (NLT)
Keep right on building yourself up in your inheritance. You live in a world that is full of evil influences. Satan would like you to forget the reality of being born again and never realize your place of authority in Christ Jesus, because if you do, that power you walk in makes you absolutely dangerous to him. He has no defense against you when you walk in the power of God’s Word
Three decades of government land seizures, rampant logging and oil palm expansion has decimated Sarawak’s rainforest and disenfranchised its native population. Yet a seismic political shift is occurring, which represents real hope for Sarawak’s people and its beleaguered forests. Through the work of tireless activists, a reform movement is rapidly gaining ground and exposing the duplicity of the existing government, and its ‘Godfather’, the Chief Minister Abdul Taib Mahmud.
Flashlight with spare batteries
I took this as no bad thing.
Too Young To Date b/w Every Time I Ask You Out
It is also a comfort to know that my mom will do this as long as she can for my family every Christmas, and everything willing - that will be for a long time to come. Then it will be a tradition that I will carry on and hopefully my kids will carry on.
But down the road, it’s getting more clear with new revelations concerning the LAW. I was reasoning a lone why Christ had to come if at all the law was effective.
strange, this easy, hazy warmth–
pizza dough. Roll into a rectangle 8 inches x 12 inches. Spread
And seeing as, when I went to the pub for a rare treat just eight weeks ago (and I can’t believe the last time I went to a pub was two months ago), I was surprised to find I hadn’t got enough cash on me for more than a couple of pints, so it seems the pub visit will become, like a dodgy French burger, even rarer.
For the past few weeks and months I have, (horribly as anyone who has ever done the same will know), been wondering what I was going to do with the rest of my life. I tend to ask myself this every year or so, but not for more than a few minutes before something ridiculous comes along to distract me from the dangers of Real Life. Recently, however, I wondered if I should stop being distracted and actually choose a job to do and, perhaps more importantly, where to settle down and do it.
I responded with the universal language: money. In China the currency is called renminbi. The slang expression is kwai. Think dollars and bucks. I handed her the equivalent of $140.00 to cover the cost of whatever the children wanted to eat. That $140.00 was equivalent to one month’s salary for the manager, and she knew that she could expect a very large tip for putting up with this ragtag group.
ni ni (night night)
How do you use it?
believe it or not, i've had a really hard time getting dressed lately.
- A batch of kaiser roll dough makes nine 3-ounce rolls.
Kevin’s Mind: So there are reasons why we think like we do, in particular the negative and destructive thoughts. The enemy is opportunistic; he’ll use whatever method he can to get to us. My human nature, my tendency as a man, my flesh nature leans toward pride. My flesh always wants to work with the Devil. My pride is always trying to pull the New Covenant, the undeserved gift of salvation, out of the picture so that I have the right to feel hopeless, angry, negative, all things that work with the Devil and not against him. He lies in wait and slips in there when we’re tired and weak, and he often uses old wounds, old tender spots. Like Alistair Begg says, if we think we don’t have to maintenance old weaknesses we’re fooling ourselves. Remember the description of Battle in the introduction, that it is a prolonged conflict toward a definite end? Satan will invest any amount of time and effort and he’ll pull out all the arsenal in order to have a definite outcome in his favor.
Gregory: the tea party seems to have lost its influence
Goodbye A, B, C, D, the mean parts of E, and all the others I have hurt or been hurt by in the process that is love.
Then Daniel went to his house, and made the thing known to Hananiah, Mishael, and Azariah, his companions: That they would desire mercies of the God of heaven concerning this secret; that Daniel and his fellows should not perish with the rest of the wise men of Babylon. Then was the secret revealed unto Daniel in a night vision. Then Daniel blessed the God of heaven. Daniel answered and said, Blessed be the name of God for ever and ever: for wisdom and might are his:
“We have become a sloppy bunch of people. We say things we don’t mean. We make promises we don’t keep. “I’ll call you.” “Let’s get together.” We know we won’t. On the Human Interaction Stock Exchange, our words have lost almost all their value. And the spiral continues, as we now don’t even expect people to keep their word; in fact we might even be embarrassed to point out to the dirty liar that they never did what they said they’d do. So if a guy you’re dating doesn’t call when he says he’s doing to, why should that be such a big deal? Because you should be dating a man who’s at least as good as his word.”
Since then, it’s been so strange to see Naima every day, with her white jellaba, scarf, socks and shoes, busily selling candy to a 100 screaming kids or cheerfully chatting with the mothers after morning drop-off. She’ll wear white for 4 months and 10 days, the traditional mourning period. It’s a constant reminder of death. We talk about it often, revisiting the story of her husband’s death. And every time I am awed by how real her strength and faith are. More often than not, we both end up in tears, and laughing for no other reason than that we enjoy each other’s company. Exchanges of baraka are possible anywhere, anytime, if we are open to them. If you’re not getting any love then you just have to be the one that gives it. A kind word, a smile, a sincere prayer are what soften and open hearts.
How a religion formulates its relationship with pain is very telling. Is it good for you, as the older book religions sometimes suggest? Or is it something we can and should avoid, as modern society seems generally keener on as an idea? Do we need pain and misery in our lives to make us rounded, spiritual people, or do we need to overcome it in order to achieve permanent happiness? How a religion, or for that matter a religious person handles this issue can be quite telling.
I have to assume, then, that we're moving ever closer to true deep-water city-states – only they won't be libertarian ocean-going homesteads, after all, they'll be distributed networks of supercomputing villages afloat on, and drawing power from, the tides.
The cringe beset (and indeed cringe inducing) Australian Prime Minister Kevin Rudd has stepped into the issue, assuring the protesters that his children “absolutely love Bollywood movies” and adding the somewhat Anglophobic aside that, were it not for the “wonderful” cuisine of India, Australians would have been condemned to “100 years of eating English food”.
I imagine it would be a fascinating sight to witness the formation of planets and we get such a small glimpse in Genesis chapter one. God, in one chapter, forms all of the physical world and as we read, we don’t often realize this, but we are witnesses to this from a perspective along side the creator; this does not happen very often.
First, the employees had us all sign in on a sheet and then they would come by with our books, which we had to pre-purchase in advance. We were also given the option to purchase any other books by Giada as well as more copies of her current book, Weeknights with Giada.
Kid: No, she told me she did it at home. I just had to tell someone.
Birnkrant called Gillibrand’s suggestion to kill more birds “ a kneejerk reaction that won’t work.”
Feature up from entry-level S trim exclusive to the 2.5L model through the center line of the SE and top-line SEL levels are available on all models. All 2012 Passats come with dual-zone automatic climate control and steering wheel audio, Bluetooth, and cruise-control buttons.
Flaws or imperfection add depth and humanity to the characters in a narrative. For eg. the mayor with a penchant for gambling, the hero with claustrophobia, the heroine with an alcohol problem, the girl suffering from kleptomania. One of the most famous example is ‘ Strange Case of Dr Jekyll and Mr Hyde.’
The fourth phase (if applicable) is known as “Reverse culture shock"
“Twenty dollars.”
U.S. Department of Energy. (1995). Nuclear reactors built, being built, or planned. Report No. DOE/OSTI-8200, Rev. 58. DOE, Washington D.C.
“Colin. Colin Davis.”
Happy First Day of Spring! :)
100% NO.
bears. beets. battlestar galactica.
Is it just me? Am I the only crazy OCD writer who notices this and is irked by it?
So, back to business with a fresh mailbag. Sorry I missed last week, but after everything that went down in Stonetalon, I really wasn’t up to answering letters last Monday. Luckily that’s all in the past now, so I can get back to the blog and not be reminded of that whole disaster. Let’s see what we’ve got this week…
I eventually sold a half-dozen Imbry tales to Postscripts, which led its publisher, Pete Crowther, to ask me for three novellas about him. They would come out once a year. The second, The Yellow Cabochon, should appear soon. I’ve just proofed the typescript.
I know it doesn’t look that evil. But it was.
In their singular style
4. Whipporwill
Several other things to consider is that people because of emotions and fears often do the wrong thing at the wrong time. DIY’ers and ETF enthusiasts have no restraints to stop them from making bad financial mistakes.
Were you still working as a journalist at that point?
I absolutely love the holiday season. Christmas has always been my favorite time of the year, but I must say that Fall is catching up to it. We might not have "real" seasons in Los Angeles, but it's definitely starting to feel like Fall here. The cold(ish) weather, the light blustery winds, and the pumpkin baked goods and coffee drinks popping up everywhere...
If anyone is interested in learning more on the topic, please comment and let me know. I could go on and on and on... :)
When I first read the article, I didn’t know who Brian McLaren was, though I had heard of him through conversations and other articles I’d read. The magazine informed the readers that he is an author and speaker whose new book is entitled, A New Kind of Christianity: Ten Questions that are Transforming the Faith. Pretty heavy sounding. Anyway, I looked up his book on Amazon.com and read some reviews and a short bio.
Toyota, Pioneer Electronics and IBM were among the corporations that held seminars and classes.
Consciousness is the cardiogram of the entire-creation-entire
Needless to say, since Bouie is an AA hire, he is vulnerable, and has to be protected from evil, wacist whites. And so, most critical comments were either deleted or blocked altogether, but several critics were permitted to post, in order to create the illusion of tolerance.
The stories include the very familiar (Ali Baba and the forty thieves, Sinbad the Sailor, Aladdin and his lamp), and dozens and dozens that are just as good but that you've never heard. Some are very short, some are very long, and many of them repeat elements from the other stories. Sultans are constantly going out in disguise among the common people and overhearing things; men accidentally catch glimpses of women through their veils and fall so deeply in love that they become ill until they can have their beloved; sultans have no heirs and pray to God that they would do anything for a son, but their heir ends up coming with a catch; comeuppance is rampant; and people tell their stories, and within their stories more characters tell stories in a nesting box of creativity.
It denotes time and eternity
though by coming here you must
as He is concerned, there is no challenge big enough and no demon powerful
In a few hours, Tony Diaz's Librotraficante Caravan will be on its way to Tucson. The caravan consists of carloads of banned books Diaz calls "wetbooks" that his caravan is "smuggling" into Tucson for use by students who were in the Mexican American Studies courses that were shut down in January. Authors of the banned books are supporting the caravan by donating money and books.
In an interview with inSing News, Mr Nair said:
Have any of you interplanted carrots with your tomatoes? If so, how well did it work?
Other Kirin kids arrive and dance, and Baekhee and Hyemi even high-five when the battle is over! Oh, yes, we're leaning toward a renewal of friendship. Baekhee is all set to make up with Hyemi when she overhears her own band manager plotting to replace her with Hyemi. Gah!
they worry that
Ella dreamed of an old woman who was abandoned along with her kids. In Ella’s dream the name of the man who abandoned his family was Carlo’s real name. Hmmm.
i tell him the same thing i told the first man.
Each event also serves as a training program, as attendees learn about networking, recognizing and capitalizing on their talents, using the services available to them and perhaps the most important aspect of a job search: how and where to look.
Your arms around me,
3 Don’ts to Résumé Writers
• Review- Liturgical Objects at Mass (pew, stoup, altar, chalice, ciborium, Body of Christ, Blood of Christ, tabernacle, bells, lectern, ambo, Lectionary, missal, Book of the Gospels, Processional Cross, cruets, Presider’s/Celebrant’s Chair) using Liturgical Objects Used at Mass Cards.
You'll taste delicious hors d'oeuvres, sip cocktails, browse wedding invitations and floral arrangements and of course enjoy some wedding cake!
Transmission and Reception: Local production
Even today,the way she walks up and down the stairs, open and closes doors and even just talking, you know she is there!
Of course, this was the late, (but pre-Thatcher) 1970's, and attitudes to art were a little different to those prevailing these days. The arts 'industry' was in its infancy. But I remember a vibrant mix of exhibitions, a buzzing bar and the sound of avant garde music playing everywhere you went.
“The error was using and abusing disappeared like a mystery,” he added. “And that’s not the case, it is the unfortunate result of a war.”
Used in conjunction with the even coating from the chisel nib, and you can achieve a neat duo-tone effect.
It's a bit of a ritual for me to watch Dead Poets Society before the start of the new semester, as inspiration, as warning, and as sentimental indulgence. This year, I thought I would make some comments on it as I rolled through it. Time-stamps are meant to help you watch along, should you desire. I didn't do much editing, so forgive the typos and bewildering punctuation.
Inspired by Lindy Loo's completely unappetizing-looking, yet strangely compelling chickpea cutlets shaped into nuggets, I thought I would give it a try. The results were the chickpea cutlets I know and love reborn as perfect dippable chickpea nuggets! We served them with homemade ketchup, mustard and BBQ sauces.
Science is shifting attitudes too.
Dalek Invasion of Earth
Paul Michael Beyer, 37, New York, N.Y.
-jera
Joe: Goats?
The boys had a day off from school a few weeks back, so after breakfast we hit up one of our favorite stores, Lippman's Party Co. It is pretty much the most wonderful store in all the land. ALL.THE.LAND!
Here are just a couple basic grammar tips. I recommend you follow them.
Yum! I found this recipe on pinterest and was mesmerized by the photo! Mine didn’t turn out with quite so many “tunnels” but hey, it was my first try and I adapted the recipe a bit to fit what was in my kitchen! Next time I’ll follow exactly and post the results!
Since Monday, I have had a knot in my stomach as I readied myself for the departure of and said goodbye to a good friend. While I believe his next chapter in life will bring him growth and success, my reaction to him leaving surprised me: I was much sadder than I thought I would be.
What is man, that thou art mindful of him? And the son of man, that thou visitest him? For thou have mast him a little lower than the angels, and has crowned him with glory and honor.
Our own bodies are our own responsibility, and we need to wear condoms, get tested, and perhaps most importantly, start talking.
Phoenix attorney Richard Keyt, who discusses legal issues related to medical marijuana on his blog keytlaw.com, noted that McVey’s ruling means landlords who rent to medical marijuana dispensaries may not be able to take squatting tenants to court.
Now that has been sitting in my basement for a couple of months and much of the yeast has dropped out. Just last week I racked into two, one gallon glass jugs. I'll let it age in there for a few more months, then put it into bottles. I have it in mind to bottle half of it still and slightly sweetened and the other half carbonated, for rhubarb "champagne".
“It’s certainly cold for this time of year, particularly for a May Bank Holiday weekend,” a Met Office spokesman said.
Cook the shrimp next. Place the stick of butter in a sauce pan, and melt it over medium heat. When melted, add the smoked paprika and the shrimp. Allow the shrimp to poach in the butter for about 5 minutes. Do not overcook the shrimp – the final assembly and cooking of the Hot Brown will finish the job of fully cooking the shrimp.
As Tyler and Caroline danced the night away, Elena and Stefan–who didn’t complain about the dancing once–also hit the dance floor. For some reason, Elena thought that a slow dance was the perfect moment to bring up her recent road trip/make-out session with Damon, but Stefan dismissed it, saying he didn’t want to know because, if they end up together, it doesn’t matter. After that, he dipped her in a moment so sexually charged it almost makes up for the fact that they haven’t kissed since…well, a while. The moment was ended abruptly by the arrival of Damon and bad news (what else?). Jeremy, observant as always, followed the threesome outside, awkwardly knocking into Bonnie and her date, Jamie, on his way out (gotta love it).
21 Feb 2012: Shrill libertarian UK pro-smoker Christopher Snowdon publishes clichéd, error-ridden and commentary on plain packs for tobacco industry funded Adam Smith Institute.
Or I’ll go for a designer that cuts suits to flatter the female form like Vivienne Westwood. Cue, Mango and Warehouse are my high street favourites for fashion forward suits with feminine tailoring. I look for cute details like pleats or frills on the skirts, peplums on jackets, puffed shoulders and nipped in waists.
leaky molasses
Today at work we were talking about who is going to be the male bartender on Monday's and Asian Situation said we should have Steve bartend, well that would work except Steve tends to not play nice when idiots are around and will bite them if they don't tip him well. We were laughing because we could put Steve on the schedule and realized that a fictional character of mine and T-bone's imagination just wouldn't suffice. Steve has become a trend through out some of the staff but is still making his way into the popular inner circle. We would like to invite you to use Steve as our mascot and use phrases such as: Dont pet the Steve, Steve is coming to the bar, Steve needs a drink, Steve is out of control, Steve doesn't like when you do that, etc etc. The more this catches on the funnier it will be. If you want a shirt after seeing our awesome design we can get them made for you.
Second, even with a reasonably powerful zoom (Canon EF 100 – 400 mm f/4.5 – 5.6 L IS/USM), it’s asking a lot for the camera to properly expose and focus on a fast moving dog in changeable lighting. Even with the zoom, the lens sees mostly the background (tree, bleachers, grass) and tends to focus on the brightest thing in the frame, which usually isn’t the dog. You can almost hear the aperture say, “Whoa – wait up!”
But investigators said Atkinson had no custody rights to the boy.
* go to the toilet first
There is one silver bullet – if a gun is to your head and you had to cut 100 words, what would you cut? That puts the passion into the piece, but it’s about moving it forward and making it more powerful.
24. Do you eat while watching TV or using the computer?
Now I could go across the road and buy a couple of bottles of Weiss bier at £1.70 a pop, or 3 for £4 fine English ales and tell you how nice they all are, but currently I can buy 15 cans of Stella for £7.49 at Sainsbury's. It's free if you put one under your arm and run for it. Oh glorious wife beater, reassuringly cheap.
I can’t believe that I haven’t told you about our first CSA box for this season!! It started one week earlier than anticipated due to the strawberries coming in! I can’t believe we are already slurping fresh, local, organic strawberries. And they are just as delicious as we remember them.
Saturday was very tiring. We toured almost the whole Baguio. We were not able to go to the Strawberry farm because it was already outside Baguio and we don’t have any more time. Our departure time is 5:40PM to Manila.
The Alpha Kings are a complex experiment that is a little out of my hands. I preached, you are your brother's keeper from the very begining, and fiercely individulistic from a grab what you can culture, they rebeled at that notion of accountability. Through meditation (every morning no matter what) a class chant, and class missions, like a peace walk and a car wash, they have become one. There is very little bullying and only the top alphas really get into it, and I'm glad to say that we've had no major infractions, though we appear wooly. We had one fight this year, which was a reactionary when one student thought another spit on him.
Lady Baltimore. Owen Wister. 1906. 272 pages.
Have a sweet day!
He would remain on full pay until all the appeal processes were completed, ANC spokesman Jackson Mthembu said. - Sapa
Melissa Peda's table runner is so cute! It is made with six inch blocks that feature fussy cut Bleeding Hearts (from the Strawberry Serenade fabric) down the center and Primrose Posy triangles down the side. The bright white and blue blocks add a sense of humour.
If you want to really add to the complexity and interest of your emotions, and if you want to raise the stakes financially, you could crash into a fancy car. You wouldn't want to crash into a Ferrari or brand new Porsche Boxter; that would be a bit too serious, but you might try something like a 40th Anniversary Edition of a Mustang GT that is painted with a special issue paint called "Crimson Red."
Rosehip Seed Oil(Rosa Affinis Rubiginosa) contains Vitamin A, which helps to delay the effects of skin aging, assists with cell regeneration, and promotes collagen and elastin levels to increase. This results in firmer, smoother, and more youthful skin with greater elasticity. Rosehip seed oil also contains a high amount of essential fatty acids and Vitamin E, which further promotes healthy skin. In particular, it is rich in linoleic and linolenic acids, which are important skin nutrients.
Turn out dough onto a floured surface and roll out to about 1/2-cm thickness. Transfer to tart pan, pressing into sides of pan with fingers. Dimple bottom with your fingers and trim excess dough from the edges of the pan.
i painted knobs that looked like this, originally, for a client. he had a huge kitchen that needed all-new hardware, and instead of purchasing around 60 new knobs, he just paid me to make them look like antiqued "blackened bronze" hardware. (i actually painted a brass tub faucet/knobs to look like this too. it worked really well, and was WAY more inexpensive than buying a new faucet, which can be around $250 for the cheap ones! i only charged him $20 to do his faucet, and, believe it or not, it's really water and wear-resistant) this is a simple idea, and YES it actually stays put long-term. (i scuffed them, painted them, and distressed them, then sealed them. after all of that, they are good to go!)
After they baked I broke one in half and gave her a piece. Her reaction? She spit it out! I couldn't believe she did that. Luckily her "daddy" wasn't around to say "I told you so!". I asked her what her problem was and gave her the other piece. That one she ate, and then she picked up the one she had spit out and ate that too. And, then, looked up at me, with her big brown eyes shining and her tail wagging, and clearly gave me signals that she would love to have another one, please. Which I gave to her.
As the sun rises, they're exposed. How to move without arousing suspicion is a problem since the workday has begun and the suits are bustling into the city, traffic jamming as it does. Oddly, no-one bats an eyelid. Quirky street theatre is commonplace and these players arouse no suspicion.
I got some money in my pocket shoes on my feet
My sister is graduating from college in a few weeks.
And of the golden chances that have passed me by
If you have an iPad2, you can use a projector and Apple’s connector to present your notes to a group. Although the developer claims you can “connect your iPad to a projector to show off your sketches…” it is not clear if this feature is available on the 1st generation iPad.
In the mostly Muslim north, the prospect of losing a quarter of the country's land mass -- and the source of most of its oil -- has been greeted with resignation and some resentment.
1/4 cup shortening
“Esoteric Tendencies in Russian Cosmism” Little known in the West, Russian cosmism is an important movement in Russian thought rooted in the ideas of the nineteenth century thinker Nikolai Fedorov (1829-1903) and extended, through the twentieth century, into a comprehensive, holographic view of the universe, treating elements from traditional esoteric doctrines as legitimate subjects for scientific, theological, and philosophical enquiry. Major figures in the cosmist movement include the rocket pioneer and grandfather of the Russian space program, Konstantin Tsiolkovsky, (1857-1935), the geologist, biologist, and developer of the theory of the noosphere, Vladimir Verndasky (1863-1945), the creative theologians Sergei Bulgakov (1871-1944) and Pavel Florensky (1882-1937) and the philosopher Nikolai Berdyaev (1874-1948). This paper focuses on the esoteric elements in cosmist thought and on the idea of active evolution, the cosmist insistence that we have the ability, indeed the Christian or rationalist duty, to determine the course of future human and cosmic development.
Partners Assigned April 11th
The beginning of the moment was sort of a blur, I didn't realize the photographers were snapping shots of me walking with my MOH, and neither did she. She was still in her sweats and flannel shirt helping me tote my dress as to not get it filthy before the ceremony.
Are you thirsty for knowlege? The Bible is the water our Lord God gave us to quench our Spiritual Thirsts. I want EVERYONE to be able to have the chance to quench their thirsts, thats why at this point in time i will be giving away FREE Bibles to anyone who wants one. (Please note Bibles are on a first come first serve basis. If you request one and i am currently out of stock your name will be put on a waiting list)
d) Tap dancing even though Ed Sullivan is still dead
But the child's sob curseth deeper in the silence
At the same time, it provides guidelines and detailed teachings for a just society, proper human conduct, and an equitable economic system.
Let’s get outraged about the casting decisions by the makers of Two and A Half Men or the shameful tokenism of virtually every show you can think of. Better yet, let’s have a come-to-Jesus conversation about race on TV and in film more broadly. Let’s not make the women and the people of color battle amongst themselves.
So, for the loyal readers that have occasionally been checking this blog, I guess I owe you an apology. I didn't mean to leave you all so abruptly. Certain situations warranted such actions, strictly personal, of which I will not discuss here. I do, however, have to discuss the results of those actions, which has lead to limited brewing and a self-imposed hiatus on alcohol intake. Although, Dear Reader, don't be alarmed. Muckney Brewing is still around, currently a dormant entity in my basement, but will again see the light of day. In the mean time, stay tuned. There are (hopefully) events on the horizon that will hopefully pique your interest.
Historians estimate there may have been only a few hundred unconquered Seminole men, women and children left - all hiding in the swamps and Everglades of South Florida. No chicanery, no offer of cattle, land, liquor or God, nothing could lure the last few from their perches of ambush deep in the wilderness. The U.S. declared the war ended - though no peace treaty was ever signed - and gave up.
What I don’t get is why everyone seems to think there is a universal right or wrong when it comes to their favorite genre and the genres they don’t like. Sorry, but try as you might, no one can prove that anything sucks. We might think it sucks, but if someone else loves it, who is right? Who wins?
29 Concentration Moon 2:15
Robert answered right away. It’s all about everything that makes you the most angry, he said.
I don't really think this is attributable to anything but the atmosphere and culture. Canadian brewing/drinking seems even more dominated by big breweries -- MolBatt, the Canadian equivalent of American beer geeks' BMC -- than America, and the impediments to cross-provincial beer sales haven't helped. It's not chance that the very best Canadian breweries seem to be either brewpubs, breweries with strong export sales, or new. There is acceptance of craft beer in Canada, but it seems to be behind the curve a bit.
Nancy Jardine used to be a teacher of 11-12year olds but pinged away the chalk to write full time. Her debut contemporary history/mystery novel was published in Aug 2011. Two more novels are due to be published during the summer of 2012. A fourth novel, another contemporary history/mystery is under consideration. Still a bit drawn to novels for older children, the first in a planned series of time-travel novels for children 9-12yrs is completed. And, flitting around the genres, a family saga is the current work in progress.
This is one of those recipes that created itself. When I looked in the refrigerator, I realized that I needed to use up my produce before it went bad. I had a batch of cooked chickpeas that I had made in my crock pot the day before, and alot of onions, garlic, and carrots.
He speaks to the crowd. “Like Isaiah I am naked. Yes because of Isaiah the Hebrew prophet walking naked so do I walk naked today. He is no better than I. If he can go naked in public so can I.” The cardinals and bishops decide that they too must strip off all their clothes. “God made me this way” they shout. Soon they all stand before the crowd naked. Soon smell of rectums fill the place. Many had gone to the toilet and needed to defecate. But it is natural for the rectum to smell like feces after one defecated. It is natural so if others can smell the foul odor they need to realize that this is how God made them and of course it is beautiful. This is how God made them.
The anthropologist Lucien Levy-Bruhl believed that essential characteristic of native peoples was that ‘the limits of their individuality are variable and ill-defined.’ He noted that, rather than existing as self-sufficient individual entities, indigenous peoples’ sense of identity was bound up with their community and their land. He cites reports of native peoples who used the word “I” when speaking of their group and others who see their land as an extension of their self, so that being forced away from their land would be tantamount to death (this is why native peoples are often prepared to commit suicide rather than leave their lands).
Her motivations are entirely from the opinion of others; her college, radical plastic surgery and consequent rise up the ladder never satisfies her and Cassie becomes as inwardly ugly and ruthless as the very people she hated the most. Cassie doesn't understand why she is never fulfilled as she becomes everything she perceived would bring her the acceptance she's always craved.
I have never understood Dr. Paul's opposition to abortion. Prior to entering politics, he practiced obstetrics and gynecology. Surely he must have seen first hand plenty of examples of pregnancies that never should have happened, but apparently his years as a physician just convinced him that every pregnancy should go full term, regardless of the circumstances.
She shook her head and gave me a perturbed look.
So we ordered our food and I ordered the BEER! They had three brews on offer a dark Dunkel , a Weizen and a wait for it a........ Lager!!
* CONSCIENCE: Is that thinly veiled sex joke taking it a bit too far?
As with previous works, Murakami built into his fictional system an aspect of the metafictional. As a key text defining the principles that govern the double moon world of '1Q84' (the name Aomame gave this new reality/world), Air Chrysalis could also be seen as a template for the novel 1Q84. It was at least instructive how Tengo approached the work he was rewriting. Even his definition of what constitutes literature was very telling: "If the work succeeds in gaining many people's approval and if they identify with it, then it becomes a literary work with objective value." Hence, for Tengo, and arguably for Murakami, "literary value" was contingent on mass appeal.
Do you any of you have your own bucket list? You know, that list of things that you want to do before you die. I'm sure that even if it's not an official list, there's likely one or two things each of us could name that we'd like to complete before we kick the bucket. On our trip to Montana, I got to scratch one more off my list of famous quilters to meet. Yes, yes... A bit of a weird list to keep I guess, but it is what it is!
1 tsp. lemon or lime juice
brown and blue like my latin blood
Until now the answer to that question was always what my parent's told me, "Everyday is Children's Day." But now that we are embracing the Paraguayan culture we have learned that today August 16th is Children's Day in Paraguay.
Nurul Izzah said Pekema lacked the metrics to proclaim the AP system as beneficial to Bumiputeras. — File pic
So I have some new dolls in the works for this Saturdays showcase. Here are 3 dolls that will be in it.
perilous for life
~ Straighten the entryway, put purse/keys/etc. where I can find it in the morning, tidy area (boots in particular) and give the floor a quick sweep
Jannie
I have been trying to play along with 2S4Y.
10. You reach your last day and discover you could have been a leader and left this world so much better than you found it. But you refused to accept that mission because you were just too scared. And so you failed. And wasted a life.
Recept: Wyatt is the third, Mr. President.
Of course, such a complex album requires multiple listens to take it all in, but, after listening to it pretty much every day for the last week, all I can say is that A Perfect Absolution is a fantastic record. It might even be the best Gorod album to date. Tight musicianship, great vocals, brilliant songwriting - you can't go wrong with this one.
Morgen: That’s a shame. Maybe they’ll be renewed interest given your other books are now out. I said that editing (is often) my least favourite aspect of writing, what’s your favourite / least favourite aspect of your writing life? Has anything surprised you?
But here at NaturalNews, we believe that the role of journalism in a free society is to ask the tough questions… to be a little pushy and look for the real story behind the P.R. announcements. It is sad that only the alternative media (which is quickly becoming the dominant media now) dares cover the truth about this story, but that’s exactly why we need your help in getting this story more widely read by others.
But that means button holes…which I don’t know how to do.
However, with just these functions, it is unclear to see how these adaptations get adopted more broadly. In order to get a sense of both the general stability of the community and its capacity to adapt rapidly in times of crisis, we need to turn our attention to the remaining four functions. The introverted judging functions and the extroverted perceiving functions have not been discussed. Individuals who make use of these as their primary function form slightly less than half of the remaining population, with these four functions being fairly evenly distributed amongst them. None of these functions have a close relationship to Introverted Sensation but nor is their operation opposed to it. Rather, they seem to play the role of supporting functions.
“Treat one another aright. Have you sinned one against another? Have you spoken unkindly to your brother or sister? Then go and acknowledge your wrong and ask to be forgiven, promising to do better in the future.” (John Taylor)
1. What (sane) doctor would ever, and I mean EVER, perform a “whiff” test for vulvovaginitis? (And yes, it is what it sounds like.)
My getting to bed before one or two is going so-so. The post time of this will tell you as much. I have a lot going on in my head and in my world right now and to help clear it, I am going up the coast solo this weekend. Hoping it helps. If nothing else, it can't hurt.
whenever I had any spare time I made snowflakes for friends
Louic C.K.
about it. We would like to call it a popular song rather than an item song.
The trouble is (and all you Pagans out there will really know what I mean here), how to find people who *aren't mad*? I'm very wary of getting involved with any of the big groups, having gone down that route rather less than successfully. The PF don't really have any moots, groups or gathering close by (and I've been to their London Open Rituals lots of times in the past and not really been that impressed) and I'm not getting involved with CoA again. I am too scared to put a note in my local new age shop because that will definitely draw out the nutters.
I feel a bit disloyal to the Asian cosmetics that I normally like to buy, but sometimes it's hard to look for a new powder or foundation without trying it on. Eyeshadows, blushes etc.. haven't really caught my eyes the past year, maybe a few things but I think it's because I have too many products to finish first.
And it was his sales pitch that got my attention…
Band/artist: Pink Floyd, John Coltrane, Serge Gainsbourg
It's still early, what else can I do. Hopefully there will be a part deux!
“Why couldn’t you see this and tell me earlier?” I asked.
"Ewww! I hate black jelly beans!"
The lights changed to green. He pulled his leg in; reluctantly. It bent in slow motion. He then reached for the door handle without looking for it, his hand just batting blindly in its vague direction.
I's plum tuckered out and all ready to quit.
Feeling its crisp coolness gently tug at his prick.
Gliese 581g was discovered by scientists working on the Lick-Carnegie Exoplanet Survey, during 11 years of observing the red dwarf star Gliese 581, which is only 20 light years from Earth.
I miss you and love you as much I can care
Not a high-rated collection true, but a definite keeper (this time). And lo and behold, whoever had previously owned this particular paperback was so possessive of it that he even wrote his name on the inside front cover in a show of true MAD loyalty or something like that. Nice move "Brian Davis" or whatever your name is, but if you want to get thie copy back you're gonna hafta fight me for it!
There are two levels of grace conferred in a sacrament, with the second one dependent on the intentions and desire of the faithful. Hence, we have Spiritual Communion – or “Communion of desire.” The grace of unity with God is desired in Holy Communion, and the fruits of that desire are given to the soul even before actually receiving Communion.
To remind you all of where we started, here's our old guest room just waiting to be made into a fun little nursery for baby...
And I am ashamed that I waited as long as I did.
Maybe a dress from Ghost; that doyenne of the middle age float.
Antropologie, your stores have provided many Americans with fashion/style rehabilitation.
So what’s new? First and foremost, there’s a making of doc entitled “Chain Reaction.” Unfortunately, due to the passings of both John Nathan-Turner and Robert Holmes, we just don’t get an accurate representation of what went into putting this story together at its earliest stages, which I think could have been fascinating. The topic is left to Eric “Mr. Personality” Saward to discuss, and as usual he seems so uninterested in everything. (This guy could make a solid career out of boring folks.) Beyond that, it’s a fine doc and about on par with these sorts of things. There’s also a short piece on Graeme Harper entitled “Directing Who: Then and Now,” which via its title is pretty self explanatory. There’s an extra extended scene that’s not of very good quality. There’s a nice little vintage news show with Russell Harty which
I went to the club the morning of the wedding to see how everything came together and to take a few pictures...these are daytime lighting so no pretty lights or finishing touches but you get the idea!
way across the desert wasteland. The lifepod in the distance
Sobe - Cosmic Irony (applied to lid and crease and lower lash line with MAC 217 by patting/sweeping)
An interesting article on these findings: Customer Service Roles: The New Frontier for the Over 60s? at http://customerservicepsychology.wordpress.com/2011/03/22/customer-service-roles-the-new-frontier-for-the-over-60s/ quotes Tracy Burrell, HR Manager at D&G’s Nottingham call centre who, having recognised this strength in their staff, has conducted a campaign to recruit more older people. She says “We find that our mature workers have much more empathy with our customers. They understand the issues that the person at the other end of the telephone is having.”
The previous day we had spent five hours walking through this stunning landscape as we hiked from the remote outpost of Isinlivi to the village of Chugchilán more than 3,000 metres above sea level.
This 0.35% is the "true" interest rate in Europe, and it offers a different perspective on whether the ECB's policies are actually so different from the Fed's.
With no home and facing the shaky economy, the family returns home to Slovakia where his mother was born - a country Tomas doesn't even remember. Now, with post-Communist tech issues, the TV/DVD/movie thing isn't happening. Tomas has to work to get to know Katka, to avoid racist Roma-haters, to wrestle his bilingual skills back into shape... and figure out what the heck is going on with his brain. Because, he's pretty sure he just saw a man made out of water, and a woman made out of fire, and Death hanging out with her scythe by the town fountain...
Have a good day!
At last! …but… no. No; not that one. The story is about some people in a Van with a huge sign on the side proclaiming “Judgment Day is May 21. Guaranteed.” This is his van. These are his people. And the news media is filming them as they silently drive home, like soldiers returning from a war that never happened. The news media is trying to be polite but the bystanders are snickering. The man suddenly comes to the realization that when his prophecy failed, his lifework became a mockery. His entire empire has become…an advertisement for the Enemy to show the Bible is nonsense. Can it be? Can it be?
They are our employees, dammit, not our rulers. As a sovereign citizen, I owe no respect or allegiance to judicial fiat, and no duty to obey any statutes, rules, or regulations common sense alone would deem unconstitutional with regard to original intent. Born a freeman in the land of the free and the home of the brave, color me an unchained and incurably contumacious Patriot, who has had quite enough of such tomfoolery. If we somehow survive the looming Constitutional crisis, resolving this issue should be paramount in the aftermath.
Worries: Today, I'm feeling okay. Thank you God, for the peace that only You can provide!
09/02/09 SELL XAUUSD 0.01 963.90
I have northern roots, and do not particularly like hot weather. I live in Paris partly because of its pleasant climate, but when the thermometer goes above 30° in the city it is horrible. I was suffering, but the whole city was tired. At work, everyone was complaining of sleepless nights, with open windows just bringing street noise, not cooling air.
Now for SINNERS: Like you and me! its fine to indulge once in a while.
The daylight turned to the dark of night
“Long ago,” he began, “there was a beautiful girl that lived in the village. She was known for being kind and gentle, everyone loved her. She had sparkling blue eyes, long blond hair, and her beauty was raved about for miles around. Her father could barely keep track of the offers of marriage, but she had not yet been interested in any of them.
FREE apps:
Wishing you a GREAT week!
Lindy Techniques with Neil Figuracion 7:30 to 8:30
3.Pour in water and bring to a boil.
Whether or not the lone wolves torching buildings or bombing batmitzfahs in Turkey, or wandering your local pub wearing make up, or plaguing a city murdering innocents at random is 'satanic' we'll leave it up to you to decide.
there so alone.
of her invisible hand
I call this cheater sauce because I used a jar of Classico as the base, it's just too hot out to make a sauce from scratch. You could add any vegetables you like, I used carrot and zucchini because I seem to have an abundance on hand. I wanted to use walnuts as the "meat" in the sauce but wasn't sure how that would work out so I decided to try this recipe instead and they turned out quite well. I halved the recipe and froze what I didn't eat at dinner. Make the meatballs first, while they are baking in th oven you can start on the sauce. Hope you enjoy this simple meal as much as I do!
Demonstrations & Protests:
*useful in making twine embellishments.
The alpine kitsch continued with hand-stitched reindeer on the curtains and these fabric panels: (The older I get the more I love kitsch; it always makes me smile. Then I thank God it's not in my house because I like my kitsch in small doses.)
While it might seem like bread and fish were the only things consumed in Biblical times, many other food items were important staples to the Israelites. Pomegranates, quinces and dates were regularly eaten fruits, but figs were the most significant. Figs grew all over the countryside and were considered a sought-after delicacy. Also, the phrase 'Land of Milk and Honey' didn't come out of nowhere; dairy products were copious and honey was commonly used as a sweetener or mixed with other foods like curds and fruit. Spices and herbs such as mint, oregano, mustard seed and chicory were important as well. Coriander, in particular, is a spice that is mentioned several times in the Bible.
At some time before next Wednesday conduct a Preparedness Drill, call it whatever you like to explain it to your family. The rules are:
Because there’s no way of knowing exactly when an earthquake will strike, you should be prepared to protect yourself and respond to the crisis no matter where you are. We’ve talked about what to do in a basic setting at home, but what if you’re away from home, or you’re outside? Let’s look
'The wild inflation storm occured in 1924. The Weimar economy recovered from it.'
All would be well!
I was overjoyed to see Boston Legal last for the five seasons that it did. I miss the show, but I mostly miss James Spader on television. Not only was the character of Alan Shore a bad boy, but he was quirky and had heart. He would do the wrong things, but for all the wrong reasons. James Spader has no more television appearances planned, but I hope to someday soon see him on the small screen again.
This sorry looking tree looks as if it's been struck by lightning on numerous occasions, but looks can be deceiving - amazingly enough it produces a plethora of mouth-watering lemons...you'd never believe it! Not to mention the size of some of them, one (the mutant) grew as large as a small grapefruit last year. Amongst all the other uses for this magnificent fruit, tis the season for fresh lemonade & slurpees!
Melt butter and oil in a saute pan large enough to hold the salmon and pineapple rings. Add salmon and pineapple to the pan and saute over medium heat (about 3 - 4 minutes per side).
And I felt free.
8. Do you often spend an hour or more reading a day?
Alternative Energy:
3. Theme From Elvira Madigan
I'll talk to you folks later!
In short, Mr. and Mrs. 1%, when the President of the United States says that you should pay more taxes, he’s not doing it because he doesn’t like you (although, if your name rhymes with Flit Promney, he might not like you that much), or you’re somehow a crook: he’s saying it because everyone else in this country is being asked to pony up, and why not you, too?
Writing is going, slow but going. I still have high hopes of having Ivory ready for other eyes by the 25th. We'll see. I'm super behind on 2YN. I'll catch up, then fall behind again. That's the way life goes.
A 2012 study led by Dr. David Witt, an infectious disease specialist at the San Rafael, California Kaiser Permanente Medical Center concluded that whooping cough occurs more among vaccinated children than children not vaccinated.
Today as I hid in the closet, blanket over my head, looking for emergency weather information on my laptop, I had an epiphany. If Chicagoans can handle a little, snow, then sure as shootin' Texans can, too. Texans can handle more than we think we can. Texans can do more than we think we can. And if Texans aren't living up to our full potential, then I'll just bet that nobody is!
My curiosity was piqued. Who is this guy? I became a regular reader of his stories. His style was distinctive,
neighbor who can’t encrypt his wireless router.
Gender: Who knows at this point... !! I've given up! 3 weeks!!
Jackie: We all happened to be in the right place at the right time, really. After playing in Amber Asylum for almost 10 years I was looking to play more metal-ish music. Max wanted to explore some of his more experimental riffs that weren’t appropriate for his other band, Walken. Zack wanted to play drums again, which was his first instrument, but he had been playing bass for some time. Grayceon came together entirely unexpectedly and then quickly turned into something we couldn’t get enough of.
***There has yet to be the definitive Titanic movie for me though I have seen many excellent documentaries. The 1997 movie’s special effects were good, however, with so many rich, colorful, and true stories of the actual people who sailed on Titanic, I felt that this movie was a wasted effort in its made-up storyline. A sampling of some of the intrigue that was real life drama on Titanic:
After a few months it became apparent that our little surf lodge wasn’t going to be big enough. As it happened, we’d been putting our overflow guests in the beautiful bungalows just up the road where hibiscus gardens and two cute swimming pools made for a peaceful get away, yet still right by the beach and a short stroll from town.
All papers used (other than plain card stock) was from the Echo Park Life Is Good. Also from this paper I used it to do the cuts and used the Echo Park Pink Flower Embellishment for Circle Center and Curls. I also added some pearl bling to give it a more girlie look. I have not journaled as I am making a companion page for that.
Your business has decayed pretty badly, Son", warns his old McGill pal Danny Moore. "Nobody outside a padded cell would take risks like this without reasons. Have you got reasons? Are you still doing jobs you want to, for some crazy motive? Or have you slid into this? If you have, please let me slap it out of you."
Total = 12
2. I believe this God is in all of us, it’s up to us whether we tap into Him or not.
Go to LAYER and find SMART OBJECTS which when highlighted will give you the option of NEW SMART OBJECT VIA COPY. You cannot just copy this layer by pressing CMND/Cntrl J. Alternatively, you can right click your mouse/pen and open a COPY of your smart object.
The American model is unique, but the philosophies that uphold it are not. In fact, most of them are European. The United States constitution is not designed to protect its citizens from foreign governments but from its own. All political power is held to be destructive, and the Constitution is designed to enable to country to function in spite of wingnuts in congress and idiots at the ballot box. And it works.
Third...morons! Them for their antics and me for believing them.
The problem will be shutting me up, but until then I'm keeping it zipped.
Preheat oven to 350 degrees. Roll out dough on a lightly floured work surface to a 1/4-inch thick. Cut into snowflakes with a 7- inch snowflake-shape cookie cutter. Space 2 inches apart on baking sheets lined with parchment paper, and refrigerate until firm, about 15 minutes.
Every minute spent day dreaming is one in which I don't think about smoking.
2- Driven Under" - 4:58
These are just few examples explaining the purpose, and effect, of the legislative program adopted since 1994. The government describes its policies openly as the Africanization of South Africa. The similarities between this policy as reflected in legislation and that followed in Nazi Germany after 1933 are amazing. The Nazis called their policy Arisierung, or Germanization, and it was aimed at the Jews. On the international level it is difficult to regard Africanisation as legitimate if Arisierung is also not so regarded. Because nobody considers Arisierung to be legitimate, it is objectively difficult to view Africaniszation to be anything else than unlawful. The German policy of Arisierung underwent a change for the worst after 1939, which can even be seen as a dangerous pointer to what might be the end result of Africanization if it is not timely identified for what it is.
With Love True Love Patterned Paper (751202)
After fiddling with it for a while, he pulls at one corner of the sealed flap. It starts to tear open, then about 2 inches along the length it breaks off.
Have always known, know that we can't escape,
Located in a charming place called Islamorada ("Village of Islands"), which is set halfway down the Florida Keys, The Moorings is actually an enclave of extraordinary beach houses scattered around an old coconut grove on the Bahamas side of the ocean. Designed by Herbert Baudoin, one of the loveliest gentleman you'll ever meet, this pocket of postcard-worthy prettiness is so photogenic that Ralph Lauren, Bruce Weber, Vogue, Jennifer Lopez and dozens of other names regularly use it for photo shoots. The week I was here to shoot the place, George Bush Sr was in the house next door, the Secret Service were on the beach and Victoria’s Secret were shooting the next catalogue on the pier. Such an oxymoronic scene, but everyone was happy. And who wouldn’t be, staying here?
However, Edna finds out that there are all kinds of women who sound just like her and sing the same kinds of songs. A kindly yet condescending engineer (Richard Schiff) tells her that guy groups are where it’s at. Her life changes when she meets Joel Milner (John Turturro), a brilliant record producer who convinces Edna to write songs for others. She figures that this will do until she can record her own material. He also changes her decidedly unglamorous name to the catchier Denise Waverly. They work out of the legendary Brill Building, the headquarters for pop-music during the ’50s and ‘60s and which saw the likes of Burt Bacharach, Neil Diamond, Jerry Leiber and Mike Stoller, Phil Spector and many others write some of the biggest hits at the time.
Subject: RE: FOI:
- Marks & Spencer
Their bigger projects are still in progress, but with small releases, such as Leather Nation EP, they already recieved support from artists, such as Bloody Beetroots, Spinz, Ian Green, Kris Kylven and many more.
He appears in the human world by his own magic. He enjoys amidst a host of jewel-like women, who are the All-Attractive energy.
I see that immense pride on my parents’ face as my brother talks about his marketing job to my uncle, about how he would often get free candies from his business dealings. And I wondered what made my parents so happy about a job that gives you free supplies of candies.
After 2 days being in Jail a female detective come to speak with me and notified me that my charge may be lessen because things weren’t adding up plus it was my first time in trouble with the law as an adult… I went on to explain to the detective I was set up to be the fall guy so she could gain the apartment so she could continue with her prostitution to pay for her drug habit and that placing the drugs on me was just a added bonus to keep me behind bars longer… The detective explained to me that it looked fishy on my end because I had drugs in my system I pleaded with detective and told her that she spiked my water as I started to wake up I was feeling to weak to move and I felt a needle poke and that my wife drugged me… That’s when she said even if I believe you how I am to prove that I said I Don’t know you’re the detective then she replied we will be in touch…
*you can buy bone in, skin on, chicken as it is usually cheaper but, it does take time trying to skin and remove the bone.
1 onion peeled and quartered
Illustrated by way of: Black & White Photographs; Colour Photographs; Black & White Drawings;
my symbol is the tree of life. and in honor of the new year and new mantras i have changed up my blog a wee bit to reflect this. i actually made 4 different header and i am not sure which one i like best yet. i am going to go with this one for now.... but i reserve the right to break my own rule and to change my blog again....lol....
They follow the wild bees
Designers, unlike artists, can’t simply follow their creative feelings. They work in a commercial environment, which means there are many points to consider. Designers have to ask themselves questions such as: ‘Is the product really wanted?‘, ‘How is it different from everything else on the market?‘, ‘Does it fulfil a need?‘, ‘Will it cost too much to manufacture?‘ and ‘Is it safe?‘
7 various duplicate BPO’s (I couldn’t remember I had it so bought it again)
I asked my neighbor if she had ibuprofen. Nope.
Your old pal Sausage Fingers was just 'busted' while gauging the sweater puppets
Ultramarine Violet
Nicely have to any create a phone call in that particular to the NHL, Arniel said.
The story is fast-moving; Hawkings did not dwell long on Kayla’s life inside the lab. She focused more on Kayla’s (and her fellow lab rats) life on the run. The characters are okay enough but i was detached from them (i felt Nicole, though). It was also said that Kayla is special but Hawkings did not reveal why. But the natural disasters added a nice touch on their predicament. This gave a hint of an upcoming post-apocalyptic world that is exciting to anticipate. The romance is predictable and rash, but i know it will get better in the next books.
Elephants are learning to dig tunnels.
Sarkozy has already been slapped on the wrist and if he wants to continue to be the French president, which he does, why should he stick his neck out? Moreover who is Najib? Sarkozy would not waste his time and reputation on a person he hardly knows and who has absolutely no stature in the international arena.
Then there's Theo. He has learned so much this season. He's awesome at defense, and even though he almost always passes rather than shooting during games, when he practices he sinks almost everything.
Publisher: Bantam Books
Managing your time for genealogy activities can be different than managing your time for other things. What is your purpose in doing various genealogy activities? Are you trying to learn more about specific research skills? Are you a name-gatherer, trying to add people with basic information in order to be a help to others? Do you have a targeted focus on a specific ancestor or place? Questions like these can all help direct your time and effort. If you have others in your family or area who also research, this may further help define your time management. If you know that Cousin Betsy is focused on adding people with basic information to the tree, you may choose to aim your efforts toward going deeper on a specific ancestor or branch, knowing that you and Cousin Betsy can share and benefit from the other’s efforts.
Open Your Eyes
And don’t even get me started on greedy, lazy landlords. That’s another blog post altogether.
How are they doing this? What wizardry allows them to take this kind of time off of work and spend this kind of money? Because we found out from the Aussies that their trips cost $60,000 each. You read that right.
When all was said and done, I think that the Blogfest was generally successful, and I commend Ms. Crawford and all the others involved for their hard work in organizing it. I do hope it will become an annual institution, but also that it'll offer a more representative sampling of the incredibly diverse range of topics covered by bloggers doing their thing here in Brooklyn. Kate and I enjoyed ourselves, though, and I'm already looking forward to next year's event. Maybe I'll even have run a few times by then.
My next act will be to forget I ever read this book and get my hands on GUARDS! GUARDS!, Vimes’ debut novel. Can’t wait to start at the beginning and get to know this guy.
My personality is wired to worry, to perfect and to fret, to list and to plan and to organise every hour (yes, almost every hour) of my day so I know exactly what I am doing at any given point. I organise to cram it all in. I tell myself I am optimising my time.
During the inquiry, the Land Transport Authority pointed out areas of ‘concern’ in the maintenance regime of SMRT, noting that SMRT’s maintenance expenditure of trains and tracks did not keep pace with the increase in ridership.
I will try this week to get back on top of the posts and catch up on my blog reading. I might even crack a nice beer and relax.
Harry Kellar is still remembered fondly as the Dean of American Magicians, and he is also the first in a long line of Harrys. Born Heinrich Kellar in 1849, Kellar was a rambunctious child, the sort who liked to dance on train tracks just to play head games with the engineers of oncoming locomotives. As an apprentice pharmacist, one of his experiments caused an unfortunate explosion. Unable to take the pressure of small town life, he hopped a freight train and ran away to New York City where he found employment as a newsboy. He was taken upstate and enrolled in school by a minister who’d recognized his worth, with the understanding that upon graduating, he too would become a man in the cloth.
The 2nd Annual PS 58 PTA Flea Market
My voice is drowned
This behaviour has brought disgrace and demoralisation upon the entire nationalist movement, and has provided manna from heaven for critics of the party who can now justifiably point to the long list of freaks and madmen appointed, encouraged and protected by Nick Griffin, as evidence of the party’s inherent sickness.
Manager - Mark Powell aka Sparky
1/2 of a 14-ounce bottle ketchup or chili sauce
12. The Numbers Game
when your feet ached and your back grew sore
And then the seeing pattern belongs to one of the three pieces that make up the nine chord pattern.
These are what I see as the critical tasks areas that we’re going to be focusing on. Each areas has quite a few – no a LOT of tasks within it.
Fittingly, the Bible also ends with a wedding. In the book of Revelation the culmination of time and history is a wedding feast, this one is between Jesus and his people, which John likens to a bride. So biblically speaking, the zenith of creation is a marriage and the summation of all time and history is, again, a marriage.
I want to Have that style of the baggy jeans and the form fitting v-neck t-shirt.
Then a reality hit! My baby is due on 23th of August. The conference is from 25th to 29th of September. Hari Raya Aidilfitri (Eid celebration) is probably going to be on 30th August. So basically, we have less than a month to go Malaysian Student Department in London and apply for a passport for our baby. Mind you, it takes about 5 hourse drive from Newcastle to London. Plus I am still within my confinement period during that time.
For me, this is the best multimedia phone of 2011. And the gamepad? You would never imagine going back to on-screen touch controls again after using a physical pad on Android games.
I just rendered my first batch of lard, made from the kidney fat from our own Mulefoot hogs. Isn't it gorgeous--there to the right? I've been reading up on traditional cooking, in particular Nina Planck's Real Food, and I am a 100% convert to "real" fats. No more "healthy" canola oil, sunflower oil, soybean oil or safflower oil! Planck documents, quite convincingly, that these oils are relatively new industrial creations, and are the real cause of obesity, heart disease and all the other modern diseases we Americans have been plagued with since switching to an industrial diet. These oils are present in just about every processed food on grocery store shelves.
My iPhone has a speaker button on it, which means that I don’t always have to put it to my ear. If I like, I can just leave it on the desk and shout at it. Apparently that’s what people do.
The Washington brain-trust chooses another QB: Kirk Cousins from Michigan St.
But now everyone's been arriving and I've spent the last TWO nights staying up writing. I've finally gotten over the hurdle and I'm LOVING my Work in Progress. YAY!!!!
“It’s so nice, so quiet,” he said as he stood gazing, on and on at the rolling hills infront of him. There was a moat that quietly slithered in and out of the mountain reflecting the blue of the sky. And the colors painted infront of you were so vivid you could touch them.
A little blue pot containing thousands, possibly millions, of microscopic keratin hair fibres in your colour of choice that, when sprinkled over a thinning head of hair, attach themselves firmly to the existing hairs, thus increasing the thickness and density of that area.
love those glittery holiday decorations.
The world wide web is a very valuable software in finding out the trustworthy lenders or solutions on-line so take some time and look the different skills of lenders since you will be also about to give some of your personal information for many years. Continue being free from danger continually since you won’t know what’s going happen upcoming.
United Fresh is one of the leading partners for Mrs. Obama's Lets Move Salad Bars to Schools project, and has already placed dozens of kid-sized salad bars in schools across the US.
From The Daily Beast Article:
D’AMELIO r, BISELLI r, CALI g, PERAGALLO MS. Vaccination policies in the military: an insight on influenza. Vaccine 2002; 20 (Suppl. 5): B36-B39.
People are treating themselves in more private, internal ways.
My last year.
Carrying a big stack of paper with you never looked so good.
I can swim, but hubby trained with a proper squad and cuts through the water like a shark.
A splash of chili oil
For one, a lot of them came early. Specifically there’s Jon, Cindy and Leslie of Joy in Christ Church in Cavite. There’s the CYouth-Gen Team of Makati Gospel Church (J.J., Elmer, Ken, Edriane & Kuya Jun) and there’s E.R. who comes all the way from Camarines Norte.
Review by Karen Tucker
As the mystery lady was leaving, she jokingly made a cute comment from the distance as she noticed me extending my arm two feet out so I could read the spa menu. :) Again, we chuckled.
for Ros Krauss
But for the filling I must admit that there is a little problem, the first batch of it, the filling never thicken, so I have to adjust it by adding more white chocolate. Be sure to refrigerate it to make it thicken before placing the strawberry on top of the filling, otherwise the strawberry will sink to the bottom.
Brilliant show from the mind of a truly brilliant man, and wonderful comedian. Bill Cosby led this show, and his comedy was muted, but always witty, but the other cast of characters, and the situations that the show confronted were what made it great. This show was REAL. It dealt with tough situations in a real way, and showed characters that had to deal with the consequences of their actions. The situations occasionally got wrapped up in a bow too nicely for reality, but I think that the show was interesting in showing an upper-middle to upper class family, living in Brooklyn Heights in the 80s, and the issues that they dealt with trying to raise their kids. Not to mention the fact that the show led to a great spinoff - A Different World.
Any duplicate entries that are not of a different craft will be removed from the draw.
Before her onrushing supplicants can trample her, she begins to experience the sensation of falling, and the breath is sucked from her as she tries to scream. Whipping winds rush past her flailing body, and she squeezes her eyes shut to avoid seeing the final impact.
There is little I can add to the praise and admiration that millions of people have given this remarkable woman - a lucky escapee from Germany before WWII, she famously spoke out against the Nazis, yet her torch song Lili Marleen was a favourite of soldiers on both sides of the conflict.
If the SPL decided newco should start at zero points, that still would not mean relegation, as a team in the top six cannot be relegated, even if its pints total is passed by teams in the bottom six.
Price: $4.49
October 1981. My dad had decided our growing family needed more room and so in short order we sold our one-story ranch-style home and moved halfway across town into a newer two story towards the end of a cul-de-sac near Piner High school. I was six and my younger brother was five. In three years’ time, my older half siblings would come to live with us in the house. We had recently transferred from public school to Christian school and I had decided I was a follower of Christ. I believe this, more than anything else, could possibly account for what happened in the house.
And everything finally caught up with me this morning, I was late for work because I could not stop crying, not just a few tears, but sitting on the bathroom floor uncontrollably sobbing my heart out, because it dawned on me that it’s over, like really over, like he is moving out in less than 24 hours over.
At the Wellcome Trust, we have taken the view – with support from the research community – that funding agencies have a responsibility to help establish a modern standard for best practice in scientific publishing, where ‘best’ is defined as ‘in the best interests of research’. In partnership with the Max Planck Society and the Howard Hughes Medical Institute, we have announced our plans to launch a new journal, called eLife, which will take advantage of the latest communications technologies without losing sight of the many useful practices that have evolved in scientific publishing over the decades.
Mix together the oats and smoothie mix. Separately mix together the eggs and milk. Combine egg and oat mixture, pour in to baking dish. Top with coconut and bake for 20-25 minutes or until golden brown and cooked through. YUMMY!
Six weeks in, and my Year of Buying Nothing New is going pretty well. Some things, like white paper, have been hard to source. Freegle this week yielded two bird feeders, and chicken wire for the allotment. I’ve been borrowing and lending a lot more things like books, and giving away quite a lot of stuff including my own produce and preserves. I’m buying the seeds we need this year, though – aiming to save a lot more next year. My Saturday Guardian has mainly been sourced from the Ellie where I have started to lurk, beer in
back to the past.
This is my dinning room - this is where I have been located since August. As you can very well see it is neither comfortable or inspiring! When I had to empty out my studio to remove the offending panels off of my bookcases the stuff had to go somewhere and this is where it all landed!
The list could go on and on and on...There are few Christmas songs that I don't like. Barry and I are pretty much polar opposites on that.
Well, I do like to try and post on here at least at the beginning of each month...looks like I'm about 19 days late for this post.
Until this time, the child will have usually been learning quite happily, following her curiosity with the guidance and assistance of her parents, as EHE allows. Not having been restricted by the National Curriculum, lesson plans, or other school requirements, s/he will have been free to explore the world of knowledge, communication and information on her own terms and at her perfect pace. S/he might not be reading or writing yet, but might know a vast amount about dinosaurs, birds or bees, or the science of water, or the engineered structure of buildings, or all or none of the above, or something completely different.
Best Quotes:
* A bracelet that you are ready to upcycle into a bit of crochet loveliness. It should be a stiff, non-flexible material - plastic/metal/wood etc. ( I raided Pony Girl's dress up box, the local junk store and thrift. Just some very cheap costume jewelry, keep an eye out at yard sales too.) The more plain the bracelet the better.
Instead of lugging around a heavy purse in the store, I'll hook my wristlet over my hand, put my phone inside, and then loop my keys on with my trusty well-loved carabiner, and I'm good to go.
So everyday when I drive to the office I akan rasa sleeeeepyyy yang takleh dibendung until one day I kena berhenti tepi and take a nap for few minutes and patah balik rumah after that.
Tracking Changes: Oh, Tracking Changes, how do I love thee? Let me count the ways. I LOVE this Word tool. Whenever my editor hands me her edits, I make the changes then bring them over (one chapter at a time) to a new sheet with my editor's changes already implemented. Then I switch the ink color to blue (my personal preference) and redo the edit--turning on 'Track Changes' again so I can see what I modified since my editor's initial edits.
Schoemaker notes that one CEO obtained some empty L’eggs pantyhose plastic eggs, sprayed them with gold paint, and used them when awarding the “best mistake of the month.” That is, the mistake from which the most valuable information was obtained. As Thomas Edison never missed an opportunity to point out, understanding what doesn’t work is critically important to determining what does.
Of some open-hearted people goin' down.
OF COURSE Islam isn’t a Religion of Peace! BUT NEITHER IS CHRISTIANITY! Does that mean I shouldn’t trust everyone anyone who says Christianity is a religion of peace? I guess that means I can’t trust any politician. WHOA! What an epiphany!
Please feel free to use the pattern in any way, but please credit me for the pattern. Thanks and happy hooking
These lip tars are super pigmented so you only need the tiniest bit for your entire lips. The color on your lips also will look exactly as how it looks like on the tube, as long as you don't apply it sheer. I love how versatile this is, the finish on the lips actually depend on how much you apply. Putting it on very sheer will result in a matte lip stain-like finish, then putting the appropriate pinhead-sized amount would result in a satin-y finish.
Each type of red flag was assigned a point value. An account with 1 or 2 points on a scale to 10 was likely to survive. One with 8 or 9 cried out for further scrutiny. Ultimately, the auditors were left with nearly 200 accounts that appeared to add up to a giant money-laundering operation, with Hezbollah smack in the middle, according to American officials. Complex webs of transactions featured the same companies over and over again, most of them owned by Shiite businessmen, many known Hezbollah supporters. Some have since been identified as Hezbollah fronts.
“You, you may say
Some of the most striking interviews have been with students from the Adult Basic Education classes. The students, who were unable to attend or finish elementary school, take night classes for three years to obtain their primary school equivalency certification.
Auberge de L’Aiguebrun, outside Bonnieux, is in a marvelous setting in a secluded valley with an elegant country menu. 04-90-04-47-00.
External evidence against the authenticity of the Comma is built upon three arguments. First, there are only nine Greek manuscripts in support of its existence; and of the nine, four are marginal additions.[3] 221 is a tenth century MS and the marginal addition appeared sometime after its production.[4] 629, which was produced in the 14th century, is the earliest witness of the comma as an original piece of a MS, but the last part of v. 7 is missing from the text (i.e. καὶ οὗτοι οἱ τρεῖς ἕν εἰσι). The remaining Greek evidence originated in the 16th century and beyond.[5] The earliest Greek text in support of the KJV rendering is the third edition of Erasmus’ Greek New Testament (AD 1522).[6] In sum, there is no Greek evidence earlier than AD 1400.[7]
I'm in love with these, but I wasn't able to make anything that did them justice. Naturally, I thought earrings. But I couldn't make them work. I made four or five pairs of earrings with them and I couldn't make anything that didn't make me want to run away screaming.
The discrete appositive here is "a husky." I'm interested in how authors represent thought (especially in close third-person narration). Here Tuck uses this little device to mimic a slight cognitive pause. The result is that we can feel the character thinking, trying to remember the particular canine eyes.
(2) Since the mom-to-be wanted a feminine vibe for the event, we created a damask pattern. We brought that pattern into a custom backdrop, vessel liners, trail mix wrappers, strawberry mousse shot glass labels, and even the trays that lined the mimosas. We also brought in a striped and cross-hatch pattern to make the table feel a bit more playful since the party was for a baby shower.
This is not accomplished by standing back and saying — which I hear a great deal of — “When? Where is my money? How will I pay? I am stuck, I am bound, I am tied.” These are illusions. This is not of truth, my beloved ones. And what you are feeling is those who do not wish to have a shift. Even though their soul plan demands it, their egos push back and say, ‘No!”
Back to YG. WELCOME TO NEW YORK YG! He made it! He even found the Cinderella’s college! He sneaks in, steals clothes, finds out that Cinderella is not registered at the school, gets confused. Is found out as a thief, has to undress on
At the time Metzger wrote his commentary the evidence for τῷ θεῷ may have been “slight,” but that was before P115 was cataloged, as Philip Comfort notes in his textual commentary, adding further support for the popular reading, and so for the New World Translation’s rendition.
I love his sense of humour
The question here is one of how we can welcome the non-relational or, as Morton has put it, the strange stranger that withdraws even as it approaches. Alternatively, it is a question of, as Derrida has put it, how we can “eat well” or of what it means to eat well. Likewise, we might think of those dark passages in Whitehead’s Process and Reality where he points out that all life lives from death. Here the question would be of what it means to live well from death. The condition for this is first open in recognizing the contingency of our own system-references, or own system/environment distinction, and in therefore opening a crack where difference might emerge.
As you know, Will passed along to me The List by Jo (sic) Konrath, which I read with great interest. It's certainly an original premise, and Konrath has an engaging style. I'm afraid though that ultimately we weren't sufficiently drawn into the thriller aspects of the novel, and thus have decided to pass. Thanks very much for thinking of us for this. I'll be interested to hear where this lands. - Hyperion (who later went on to publish six of my later novels)
Well, firstly that context matters – whenever you are going to deliver information to someone – especially when that someone is vulnerable, then tact is still required to determine what level of knowledge is appropriate, and how explicit it is possible to be without overloading someone. This may sound paternalistic, but part of communicating a message is making it understandable. All at once is fine for some people, but with many, realisation and recognition of a serious illness or problem is a stepwise process.
Imagine if the life and death of Christ—His self-sacrificial giving—were the model we followed every day in every relationship…
We were soon joined by two sergeants and another officer as we arrived. We separated the two and interviewed them separately. They both had basically the same story. They had been celebrating the males birthday, at some point the male became a bit despondent and depressed. He took off walking, the female followed him and caught up to him at the bridge where she confronted him about her suspicions that he was intent on harming himself. He confirmed her suspicions and she physically tried to drag him home. (which is what the passerby saw)
when I’m feeling sad,
A joint Joe-Jameel post.
Indian J Exp Biol. 1996 Sep;34(9):854-6. Related Articles, Links
Friends John and Lorelei and wife Shirley pause for a picture while waiting for menus to be brought to our courtyard table. While it was a beautiful sunny day, it was still quite cool being March and everyone was happy to have an extra layer of clothes on.
The other night I woke up and started worrying that the way I take off my eye makeup – using a cotton wool pad – will make the skin around my eyes so baggy that by the time I’m 30 I’ll need reconstructive surgery to stop my lower lids from drooping down to my chin.
And win it shall,
In the first ten verses of chapter 2, Paul focuses on the act of God who is rich in mercy granting us life so that we could experience grace. God has raised us up, seated us with Christ, and created us to do good works. But we do not do this in a vacuum, as individuals. Indeed, each individual must be saved, and each individual is created in Christ to do good works that God has prepared for that individual to do. But something greater is afoot, and we began to look at it in our last study. More than individual regeneration resulting in salvation is the creation of a unified body of Christ. The Jewish people were God’s chosen people, now it is the Church, which is made up of people from every tribe, gender, language, and group. The power of God displayed not only brought you and I from death to life, but it created a new group of people, a new body, a new chosen race called individually Christians, and as a group, the Church. We are all one, united under the headship of Jesus Christ. Working together, as one unit under the headship of Christ, each individual in their own role within the whole would and does bring great glory to God. Paul wanted to make this clear to the gentile Ephesians and the Jewish people who were also within their midst that the old dividing lines no longer existed, they had been destroyed, and out of the ashes rose up a new man that was created to bring glory to God and proclaim salvation to the world.
May 03 1:30 AM
“If there really was (sic) that many wild fish being produced in Lake Huron and particularly in Georgian Bay and moving into Lake Michigan, we would see substantial better fisheries than what we see… they’re not going to make a beeline for Georgian Bay into Lake Michigan.”
I say HELL NO! Even if the baby is healthy, their mums can chose to kill them, ‘its the same as an abortion’ they say! I say they are wrong! It’s killing! If you don’t want the baby once its born, don’t bloody kill it! That what adoption is for! Killing your own baby because you change your mind is MURDER! And I do not care what anyone else says to that! It is murder, and that is all there is to it!
Both of my daughters are selling Girl Scout Cookies for the first time. Orders will be taken until Jan. 25th. Please support my girls and the Scouts! If you don't eat the cookies, buy some for your Mom, Dad, Grandparents, Coworkers or boss! They'll love you for it! $4 per box.. You can also donate a box of cookies. They will be given to Yellow Ribbon Operation Moms & USO Navel.
But that’s not all!
Does your child have a routine?
a small lake divides me from
which is our tagline for the
My MTV intern orientation was on Tuesday morning in Times Square. By this point, nothing was coming out of my mouth, which was really unfortunate because I couldn’t network with all of the other interns.
Come up on different streets, they're both the streets of shame.
The question to ask is, do these typesizes show clear hierarchy? Is there any ambiguity about what is the most important type on the page, the next most important and so on?
It frustrates me then, when activists in search of a cause - in my experience, often frizzy-haired academics - use cultural boycotts to disperse an inaccurate 'them and us' mentality that inhibits any relationship between the communities. Sue Blackwell, an enthusiastic supporter of a boycott of Israel, is one example. She was also my frizzy-haired university tutor.
At least my mornings are free.
It is Jocelyn Olette Taylor!
When a failure or error happens on my part and I absolutely can't explain or hide it, then I tell Matt that, since he's the oldest, we make most of our mistakes with him. He's the guinea pig. If he doesn't like it, he should take it up with God. God is the One that brought Matt into our lives first, so apparently He thought Matt could handle it.
Just a couple of guidelines to help things run smoothly.
“How does that work again?” Asked Jagred. “You’re killing them from a distance. How can you possibly eat them?”
Oh well, at least I messed up on an outside piece that's easily fixable!
Not that I didn't TRY........
I sincerely hope that no ninja is ever forced to decapitate a foe at the circus, but it is not beyond the realm of possibility.
Fine pointed to one of Facts' greatest battles, the debate over global warming.
dimensions in height,
One team member has to go up to a cattle auction, note down the total weight of each lot, count the number of steers & calculate the average weight per animal and bring their answer to a gaucho before the auction (with the inevitable shouting of numbers) ends. No calculators allowed.
2. The sheer talent of the women on the HWC To give but a few examples, one woman left Honeywell, taking the public relations function with her, and began a firm bearing her name that continues to this day to stand tall in Minnesota public relations. Another council member left Minneapolis to run a division of Honeywell in the eastern US, served not one, but two terms as a Minnesota State Commissioner, and is now head of the Minnesota Better Business Bureau. A third council member served as Chairman of the Board of the Guthrie Theater. To be working as peers with these high achieving women was a strong, empowering experience.
Half the garden is given over to tarmac.
B just got over a nasty cold and because of his cold he missed a First Birthday party of a friend. At the party kids were each given a white t-shirt and some non-toxic dimensional fabric paint to finger paint their own t-shirts. My girlfriend was kind enough to send over the paints and B’s t-shirt so that he didn’t have to miss out.
Be careful, things containing Barley Malt, Wheat, and Flour all have gluten. So Corn Flakes and rice crispies are a no go!
Like everything else there, their house brand Kirkland trail mix is super-sized. For extra snackin'.
At about 7:25, I met up with Lexi at the movie theater to see Titanic. You see, I had never seen it before tonight. I don’t know why; I guess my parents never made it out to be a big deal when I was a kid, and, despite my fascination with the actual Titanic as a kid, the idea of the film never really appealed to me until pretty recently (the last couple of years or so), at which point a 3D re-release had already been slated, so I decided to wait and see it properly. And what better day to see Titanic for the first time than on the 100th anniversary of the sinking of the original ship?!
Someday we will run it all out
'Cause I'm gonna be true if you let me
Anyway, DW and I talked a lot about it last night, and after this 4 year long roller coaster we feel the need to feel a little bit in control of this process. DW says that being told to "keep hoping the baby will turn" even when it seems futile is bringing back memories for her of all the futile hoping we have already done. It's exhausting to spend so long trying to emotionally prepare for every possible outcome. So despite the 6,000 people that have told me their cousin's baby turned at the last minute, for today we are working on mentally and logistically preparing for a C section so that we can eventually embrace this outcome with calm and hopefully excitement, instead of dread and fear.
Numbers like that don’t lie, so here are a few thoughts about wine tasting events you can immediately use…
“What is the standard operating procedure if you lose one of the control pods?” Pelley asked.
The center also may do a better job than jail at addressing chronic substance abusers, Gonzalez said. "I don't think jail is a deterrent" to chronic abuse, he said. "They consume or abuse because they have abuse issues. Punishment isn't a substantial stick anymore."In a statement, Mayor Annise Parker declared that "Incarcerating individuals whose only criminal behavior is public intoxication diverts law enforcement from more serious or life-threatening crimes," adding that "Sobering centers in other cities have proven to be time savers for patrol officers, allowing them to quickly return to their assigned duties to deal with more serious crimes."
1 ½ tsp ground ginger
Half-time substitute Andrew Surman gave his side a fighting chance just after the break. He took advantage after Hart failed to control his box in an aerial challenge with Wilbraham, simply half-volleying the ball into the net.
La Reine Margot (1845)
There are some days I swear, as parents we don't even know our own names. And the weariness catches up with us. Not the cupcake life I had envisioned.
Intermodal aspects: Pedestrian-friendly station. SMART, DDOT, charter buses; corporate and hotel shuttles; taxis and personal vehicles. Bike racks. Provides easy access to The Henry Ford, Rouge River Gateway Trail, west Dearborn and the University of Michigan-Dearborn. In future, will support Ann Arbor to Detroit commuter line and Detroit to Chicago high speed rail corridor.
That's right! Forget about peace, freedom, biodiversity, cultural diversity. In fact, say goodbye to pretty much all, if not all, those things that make life worth living...that is, if you're a supporter of biocide/agriculture...
On this above mentioned occasion, the caterers served the Kashi halwa and to my surprise, my husband tried more than two helpings! That very instant I decided to hunt for Ash gourd / white pumpkin and make this at home. My idea was to purchase one big enough to try the sweet and keep aside a good portion to make my favourite kootu.
So, yes, I am going to be learning on my own this fall. Come January, who knows if I'll be back as a part time student. It's certainly a possibility! I loved the classes. I loved the pace of learning, the professors, the people, the content of what was filling my brain, pretty much the whole experience.
“Brooklyn has been experiencing a renaissance,” Markowitz said, pronouncing one of the magic words on the “Brooklyn Day” rally poster. “As the economy slows, projects like Atlantic Yards are more important than ever.” Arguably, in a faster economy, project supporters could call AY more important than ever, given that they believe it will fight gentrification.
The History on your computer is a swirling vortex, a testimonial to and a record of your own personal distractibility.
The year is 325. The powerful Han Dynasty is a distant memory and tribes of barbarian soldiers fight over what was once the Empire. It is a dangerous time. Kai is 465 years old – a teenager in dragon years. He is searching for the person predestined to be his dragonkeeper. Kai’s search has led him to a Buddhist novice named Tao. But Tao is certain he is not the one; he has no interest in caring for a difficult dragon. He believes his path lies in another direction. But Tao must learn to listen to the voice within himself and that no journey ever reveals its true purpose until it is over.
Now I have a new problem. My shelves are completely packed with books. So in an effort to make room and to celebrate my computers' second lives, I'm giving away a copy of Incarnate. And because I want those of you who've already read it to feel all book squealy, too, I'm also giving away another book of choice.* ($20 or under at one of these retailers: Amazon, B&N, BAM, or the Book Depository.)
I think, it’s not as bad as it sounds.
co-dependent. My subjective world, and the objective world, is, for an
I can't do your routine with my job outside of the home. Any suggestions? My clean a little bit every day method may be harder at first, but when you keep it up, it's easier, because everything is cleaner and easier to maintain. You might not like the clean a little bit every day method - a once-a-week method might be better for you. I find that when I clean once a week, the house looks great for one day and then it's 'trashed' the rest of the week. By cleaning a little bit everyday the house isn't perfect, but I could whip it into shape if someone were dropping by. So my suggestion? Do what works for your family. Find a routine that works and stick with it until it isn't working anymore.
Niki Sperou
Just then, a piercing cry tore through the air and a monstrous shadow swooped over Reginald, covering him completely. Two feathered sticks unfolded into two giant pitchforks whose talons sunk into black fur, ripping the flesh as they gripped. Massive wings beat angrily, lifting Reginald up into the air so that he hovered directly over the nest where his and Bertie’s intended target, 6 large, juicy eggs, glittered demurely in the mid day sun.
The National Gallery of Art announced the launch of NGA Images, a new online resource that revolutionizes the way the public may interact with its world-class collection at http://images.nga.gov.
And finally, one of my favorite quotes, to show the passion of the man:
Hearts turn
Kooky:
Today, NaturalNews publishes a stunning story about the IoM which reveals this government-created non-profit to be a key player in the military medical complex involving a shady network of weapons manufacturers, the Department of Homeland Security, top pharmaceutical companies and population control globalists such as Bill Gates. Here, we expose who’s giving the IoM money and why the actual sources of funding behind the IoM destroy any credibility it once claimed to have on the subject of public health.
Again, I can’t thank you enough for all of your prayers and your amazing, beautiful comments. I wish I could respond to each and every one. William and I are touched and often moved to tears as we read them. Thank you!
Years after renovating his own house & swearing he’d never go through something like that again, here was my dad toiling with mine. I asked for help, but my dad would simply do it on his own. I was often left standing around. Oh, and running for coffee. “But I wanna do it,” I’d whine as my dad hustled about with my house repair for the week. “You can watch. I’ll get done quicker that way,” he’d reply, a smirk across his face.
Mozilla is an open-source software initiative. Any content on Mozilla’s website is protected under the Creative Commons copyright license, but that allows any Internet user to take a copy of the Firefox source-code to use it freely, study or change the code and improve on the design of the overall product.
When I spotted it through my binoculars, my curiousity got
So yeah, apparently Kyurem has 2 new forms. It looks like it got moshed together with Reshiram and Zekrom. I suppose its signature moves Ice Burn and Freeze Shock make sense, haha. The games are due to come out in Japan in June.
Haywired originally began life as a backstory to another idea I had. Ludwig, the main character of Haywired , was an adult living in a world much like our own. He had a wife and son, and lived a fairly little house in the suburbs of a biggish city in the 20th /21st Century, except he was also a “mad professor”. He was more than happy to live his life rather ordinarily, but Mad Professoring was a family tradition and he tried to keep it up anyway. However, one day he invents a device that could conquer the world. He tries to hide it, but word gets out and a shadowy company kidnaps Ludwig and his wife to learn the device's secrets. Meanwhile, his son finds his father gone and, with his best friend, the monster his grandfather made, and his father's assistant, Clive, who works for Ludwig on work experience, he goes to rescue his parents.
Click to embiggen
An ECET faculty (aka “IL convert “) presented these ideas to the department and helped to develop IL outcomes throughout the curriculum. Concepts of IL and creativity are often too abstract for faculty and can be challenging to teach. The team discussed lab notebook expectations, prescribed citation formats, and also use of citation organization in senior design. In the proposed redesigned curriculum, IL is spiraled throughout however it’s been put on hold due to department head staffing changes. Stay tuned, we hope for future updates from Megan Sapp Nelson. During Q&A she mentioned that student portfolios may be one method of accessing student’s development over time of creativity skills.
Gazed across the water at Swansea town
The dialogue of that evening was repeated for my benefit, and I reconfirmed that sectioned patient was not violent and had not threatened to be. The bed manager then said, “So in the circumstances, the police have to attend and move the person.”
Arabs have to understand that the world does not revolve around their race or faith and that people in obviously neutral space have the right to express themselves. Those who are religiously sensitive perhaps could demand Halal Zones where no-kissing rules apply, or no Muslims are allowed but this is a private establishment so no controls or expectations much less with violence can be applied.
I think somewhere easy to find is best.
Antoni Patek joined with Adrien Philippe in 1851 to create this company that has been probably the most high-priced rolling around in its different watches. There's little that previously falls short of with all the look-alike of those different watches. Patek Philippe Calatrava is usually a look at that is made of quality accurate with appearances that could surprise anybody that appreciate good products. The benefit of this type is it is not as difficult as being the some others this is why anyone can use it.
Too many times for the past few weeks, I was caught in one of those thunderstorm while outdoors cycling the North Eastern Riverine Loop (NERL). Weather patterns can change drastically and forecasts are not always accurate. Thunderstorm warning signboards along this route are there for a reason. The NERL is one of the most scenic Park Connector Network (PCN) in Singapore. I believe it is also one of the most hazarded areas during thunderstorms as everywhere there is water. Water is a great conductor for electricity and lightning storms are occuring almost everyday along these region nowadays.
2. Give teachers an iPad to play around with long before kids get them. Playing is good, it’s how the brain learns. Don’t think that because your teachers have used computers before, that this is the same thing. It’s not.
Braeden (as we move on to the next animal): Bye Puppy!!!!
Home today , and after the wonderful care over the weekend I had to take over and get back at it . The family and friends did great and all was well here when I got home.
